/u/azeleon 
I've got a budget of about $1000 after saving forever, and I'll be using it for image editing and gaming. I haven't started the build but I'm definitely going to invest in an SSD and a good graphics card. I still haven't decided on my exact setup yet. I'm excited because it's gonna be pretty cool knowing that I got a job and saved up money all by myself, bought everything myself, and assembled it all on my own. What sort of setup do you have?
https://www.citysuper.com.hk/en/Footer-Pages/store-locator
He isnt old enough tho... Didn't he just graduate high school. So he's like 19 or 20
If people want to lose weight, then they should cut off their leg.
Antarctica
Is anyone having any trouble finalizing auctions with MEW at the moment? For me, it is not showing the "winning account" when I search the ENS name so I can finalize it, and when I attempt to log in to my wallet to finalize, it says my wallet doesn't match the winning account, despite etherscan showing my account as the winner. Is anyone else having this problem?  Vinelife had this same issue: *What's up with the ENS? I was the only one that revealed a bid, and I didn't get a chance to finalize (it ended yesterday) and now the owner and the highest bidder fields are blank but it says it's already owned and that I could set up the resolver if I was the owner. Anyone else deal with this?*
Taako from The Adventure Zone podcast. 
According to them I was possessed but they call mental illness demons. I was taken straight to a psychiatrist after the ordeal who diagnosed me bipolar within 10 minutes, a few days later I was shipped to a mental health facility and given copious amounts of drugs until I couldn't feel. They said I fit the bipolar criteria for talking about God too much...   I don't think I'm either. I was super depressed over the whole think for a while but now I feel happy and free, frankly letting go of the pressure to believe in God helped loads! 
^ After watching his streams frequently (yeulcaelem heyy) and imitating how he studies, I can definitely say that mimicking what you're listening to/reading aloud will really help. It seems silly while you're doing it but I've already noticed an improvement in my own speaking speed and generating output. Also I can vouch for him - he's definitely getting better and having less of the same mistakes. :)
The domain seems to be down, but is this official?  [Archive.is snapshot](https://archive.is/xRpJQ) shows it was a [redirect to SourceForge](https://sourceforge.net/projects/ubuntubsd/).  No word [on Twitter](https://twitter.com/ubuntuBSD), etc.  It's probably not a good idea to jump to conclusions.  A project can be dormant for a while and then get picked up again.
Any Wraith tips?
Holy hell their shipping is nuts! Anyone know if shipping is consistent for a certain amount of amiibo? I want to order some but $65 of shipping is crazy high.
Historically, England has put more emphasis on class and ancestry than race
The El will take you to a lot of great neighborhoods on the north side.   Brown line: kedzie - Albany park, lawrence- Lincoln square, Irving park - northcenter, Belmont - lakeview, sedgwick - old town , elevated loop around the loop.  Red line: Bryn Mawr - edgewater, argyle - uptown (little vietnam), lawrence - uptown (green mill), Addison - wrigleyville (I used to live here and loved it in my early 20s now I avoid it), Belmont - meets with brown line in lakeview, Fullerton - depaul, subway through the loop, chinatown, Bridgeport  Blue line: Damen - wicker park, belmont - Avondale, Logan square, Halsted uic - little Italy/greektown  Pink line: 18th St - pilsen  I live in Beverly which is kind of out of the way but if you are nearby it's worth exploring some bars in the area ( Horse thief hollow is worth a trip). Hyde Park is fun. Almost every neighborhood has something worth checking out.
Invite 4 me? 
I'd be interested in the decklist if you have it handy.
The game is on NBC sports.
Easy 5Mil Deal- good guy. All good and within a few minutes
What a ride.
just gonna point out that the horns mean nothing because azoths horns are on his helmet, not his actual head. you can look at his lich king skin (which is a cannon skin that is once what he actually looked like, unlike something like annihilator azoth) and tell that he has no horns.
Fun fact: We were still running most (if not all) cell networks as analog back in 2001. You can get much better range with analog cellular signals and analog is not an all or nothing proposition like digita (you can still make a connection with a marginal signal on analog compared). I remember when the switchover started and everything started being done in digital on cell networks. Places you previously could get a signal became dead zones. 
Maybe that's where my metallic green rusty 25 year old Nishiki mountain bike is. It was my subway-runner, lifted from the side of the house near the East General hospital. I kick myself for never taking off my City of Saskatoon bike license.
I agree!
Awesome communication and great trader. Card arrived safely, thanks!
I'm sorry :( If it makes you feel better, my husband got it in his left eye two years ago, at Christmas time. 
www.canvape.com  
&gt;  One party can be deanonymized if the TB server colludes with the other party.   It's also worth pointing out that TumbleBit Payment Hub mode is more about to address Bitcoin's scaleability issue and enable cross chain atomic swap in a fairly fungible way, while TumbleBit Classic Tumbler mode is more about fungibility, where Alice and Bob are the same person in the [current implementation](https://github.com/NTumbleBit/NTumbleBit), so the collusion attack is not possible.
&gt;What are you graduating with? Do you have work experience (not necessarily industry)?  I'm graduating with a really general degree which is part of the reason why I'm going (my nparents pushed me into a college which doesn't offer any useful majors). I have a year in retail, and a bit of internship (in a field I don't want to go into) and volunteer experience.  Wow, it's so great you got a job so before graduation! Thank you for all the advice xx Thank God I'm a people person.
Dang. Youre right. My memory failed me. I checked my email and I got it in a Humble Bundle? I dont think it had been released yet, I got something called the Pixel Tier at the time, which was the cheapest "pledge" to get the full game
Would you happen to remember the season the song was in? I don't remember it being sung by characters, only played during the Red Wedding. I do believe the Miracle of Sound version is in the end credits of an episode, but I can't say for sure.
Hittles
This makes me feel uncomfortable everywhere.
I'll take them
The hammiesink defense:  'My examples that try to demonstrate my premises are completely incorrect. That just proves my argument.'
Economy Mods /u/ran338 and /u/eragaxshim, YOU HAVE BEEN SUMMONED!  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/Geosim) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Journalists, agents, clubs, footballers, transfer news play with fans like they are muppets.
Maybe Nausicans reproduce by cutting off an entire limb and it grows into another Nausican.
Haha! Ok, will do! 
Could be some kind of lighting or fan controller?
Over the past few seasons, they've generally been pretty talented at every position but QB, WR, RB and CB. This season, they've added a legitimate receiver and while you can't count on rookies to contribute much, it's hard to imagine being worse than last year at corner. Wentz has potential and if he realizes more of it this year, the offense should be able to compete. I'm not saying it's likely that the Eagles are a SB team or even a contender, but they are a team that can definitely make the playoffs if things break right and once you're in the playoffs, anything can happen over 3 games.
[always relevant](https://www.reddit.com/r/anime/comments/6c06t4/free_talk_fridays_week_of_may_19_2017/di3ftn1/)
I can't believe this is a thing, I'm dying. lol
chatroom
Hadn't been able to research them. Randy was fucking me on intellectual colonist rolls. 
The same thing happened to my husband.  I would love to blame chronic pain/ hydrocodone for the changes I saw happening.  That was how I justified his behavior for so long.
Where's Jared supposed to get a phone call if they don't?  This is just considerate for our premiere Russian agent. 
haha my bad man. i was getting too anxious testing so i commented out the sleep timer. lol  i pushed the first live version today and now it has a good wait time before posts
&gt;Should we allow medical treatment to those who will spread genetic predispositions to disease or disorders?  To me that question is a little odd, because if you value life but do not value creating more life with potential health problems, then the question should be "Should we allow medical treatment to those who will spread genetic predispositions to disease or disorders **without also sterilizing the people in question**?", since they should still be helped to survive, because we like people surviving.  If you don't value life... why do you care if some people have genetic disorders?  &gt;Is Modern Medicine actually helping humanity by allowing medical treatment to said population?  Yes, because humanity would have more suffering and more people dying otherwise, modern medicine makes it so that that does not happen, which is nice. If you do not agree with this, I think you need to define "help" for the purposes of this discussion.  &gt;Is Modern Medicine actually "trumping" Natural Selection at all?  [Yeah, actually](http://www.bbc.com/news/science-environment-38210837).   &gt;Could Natural Selection, in reality, do better than Modern Medicine at eliminating genetic predispositions?  Nope. Because natural selection doesn't actually get rid of any "undesirable" traits, it gets rid of traits that hinder reproduction. So anything you get after you would typically have children is kind of irrelevant (which is to say, for example, heart disease in your 40s would still be carried down to your kids, because most people have children before they're 40). 
If this is the cars best angle then you might just drive a shitbox
True kulcha chaddis don't have zippers. They use buttons.
Everyone's discussing the specs of the cars, but what if I just want to get one because I want one? I mean, sure it isn't a BMW-killer, but it's a nice car and gives you some amount of bragging rights even if it isn't necessarily better. Maybe that's just me though.
They're growing on me 
I've tried that, found that it takes far too long for any drinkable amount of liquid to get thru the coffee filter before it gets clogged up. I've used coffee filters and also the keurig cups that you put the coffee grounds in that have some kind of micron screen on all sides.
your friend is a douche for not wanting to play with u lol, u should practice more, less mm more dm like fragshack, if u were better than mg trust me u'd be able to carry all the way to atleast LE no prob.
This is some kind of bait and switch. Your relationship is based on an agreement, that includes among other things financial support to you.  Once he refuses to honor his parts of the agreement (including financial support), the original agreement is over.  Yes, you have to find a new SD. This one withdrew from your agreement unilaterally, and to be honest I see no recourse other than end it.
What's money is money. Maybe keep one for the memories, but just use the rest. If you're reeeeally worried about getting questioned by people all the time, just go to a bank when you arrive and ask them if you can exchange the 2000s for some more common bills.
100%
Dude Ranch also wasn't released through a major label, that's the loophole. It's the same reason why not a single Fat Wreck Chords release has a PA sticker.
I think they don't on purpose. It gives it a tarantula feel.
Maybe watch these videos so that you can really understand what each step and algorithm is achieving: https://www.youtube.com/playlist?list=PLgAbKrcqgW9dgg9hQOXcXq0VmYM6AGvan
Trying so hard to poop.   Good stuff mate!
Oh yeah elimination is always the first step, but CFA questions are pretty damn tricky where a lot of times I have trouble with elimination. 
Nobody is claiming that disabled people can't overcome their disability and function fully in society.  As a matter of fact, however, deaf people lack the ability to hear.  Therefore, a 'dis-  ability.'  Your analogies don't make sense.  The slowest kid on the playground could be compared to someone who can't hear very well... but not a deaf person. We are discussing the meaning of words here.  I may not consider it very tasteful to dance around a deaf person holding a sign saying 'You're Disabled' but that doesn't mean they're not.
It does this on the website on mobile safari. I'd get the app.
Cat poop chew toys
What does Wyoming have invested with the Warriors?   The letter W? Both the state and team are a hot steaming pile of L's. 
"Ello, I am from the undaworld, come with me I know the way"
Funny you should mention SCII and neural networks, [it's actually a thing](https://deepmind.com/blog/deepmind-and-blizzard-release-starcraft-ii-ai-research-environment/). In one of the followup reports they discussed how the AI was able to get insanely good at things like optimizing mineral gathering, but still failed at certain elements of overarching strategy that would be intuitive for a human. Personally I would love to see this type of research applied to strategy games like Civ, Age of Wonders, Total War, etc... if they could develop a more human-like AI without needing to resort to cheats, it would improve solo play immeasurably. 
Cracking!
Fake news! Trump is in better shape than all other presidents ever.
Y
Most do, my mom and sister know family wise and my aunt and uncle, they always went on about how they hated strippers and how strip clubs should be shut down but one day I just messaged them and was like "so hey, I'm a stripper btw" and they were surprisingly okay with it but I also live two states away from them and they don't see me often so they're always on their best behavior with me, we haven't always had the greatest relationship growing up. Most of my friends know and are accepting of it, if they weren't they wouldn't be my friends.   A few people I hide it from are my boyfriend's parents, my roommate's parents (whom are parental figures to me), and that's really about it.  He does still go, he still buys dances/rooms from me and I encourage him to still get dances with the couple other girls he used to get from if he is feeling up for it of course, I really don't mind, he doesn't seem to want to these days though lol.   I can make anywhere from 150-900, my average is usually 300-600 right now because it's been slow but I consider anything over 500 an amazing night.
Didn't Woodley say he hit Condit harder than he hit Lawler?
From what I know, the next morning text makes you seem clingy.   Ideally, she should be the one to contact you first. But at least 2 days wait is best if you're going to initiate further contact - Give her some time to hamster and contemplate her worth to you.
&gt;Everybody keeps assuming it's where Salem is   That's actually not true. I saw a post on RWBY Amino with like 400 upvotes about Salem's base being on Mistral. So no, not everyone assumes that. Plus it has been discussed on this subreddit before too. 
We've received plenty of credit for helping deliver the win.
Congrats on the big purchase :)
didn't a lot of the bungie guys stay on with 343 though, could be the reason why. 
San Junipero was filmed in my city, so a lot of the exterior shots are of places I generally visit.   If you're interested, Camps Bay where the nighttime beach shots of them sitting together taking in the scenery were filmed. Noordhoek for the daytime/driving/large beach location. 
I do not believe stockpiling all of your fate is worthwhile, as your opponent can easily set you back 2 provinces and discard anything in them you were saving fate for anyways. The key word here is "all", though. I do believe it is best to save 1-2 a turn only spending 6 or so on characters and getting extra from passing and rings going into the next turn a little richer.   If you do this the first few turns, you go into turn 3 with 11-12 fate which gives you an explosive board state that you should be able to keep in play the rest of the game. This is how I've been playing in test games and it's very effective. Fate returns are larger the bigger the character you are keeping around, so saving fate for when you have a couple larger characters to bring in can lead to some insane value as the game starts to wind down starting on turn 3.
That's amazing  Sent from my 24k gold Apple Watch encrusted with 5000 diamonds as my diamond encrusted MacBook is being serviced and I can't pick it up because I'm on my yacht, and my Ferrari is in my NYC penthouse
Bumble might be though. There's a BFF feature where you can find friends. Maybe you will match with a golfer
NES Metroid already had this, with you having to choose between Wave and Ice beams.  Spoiler alert: You can't defeat the Metroids without the Ice Beam.
No kidding. The players over at r/gtaglitches would like to talk to you.  
thanks homie, appreciate ya respecting the rules, thread is removed now
Flushed.
I thought that was his dick and was disappointed 
That is so admirable, I can't wait to see how that feels!! I can't believe how much the support of this community is helping me as well, and I am only on day 2. Not drinking with you tonight. 
I think you're hearing what you want to hear. That wasn't the vibe I got from spicer
Yea
That's how the world ends.
Rodeo is definitely in my top 3 albums, but idk i really really wanted to like this album and as much as I enjoyed it when It first came out, the only song i'm still listening to regularly is beibs in the trap (Ft. some guy who gets his sneakers for free). i was curious as to what people thought because it's common knowledge that so many people on this sub (myself included) are in love with rodeo. I haven't given up on the album yet, nor do i think travis is done being good, I just noticed today that I still listen to rodeo all the time but birds hardly ever.
What?  Yes you could.  Not with just one game on its own but I had a complete pokedex as a kid personally.  If Niantic made legendaries team locked in the current game, no one would have a complete pokedex. 
Yeah, because they're very bad companies that are doing very bad on the market.   He is rich, though. What does it matter if he has two bad companies? Why would you name those two like it means something?
Usually means they'll be on sale sometime during the event
Looking great, man.
But...the $1000/kid you're going to give them in tax credits after they have kids immediately cancels out your proposed incentive.   I'm not saying that it's a bad idea, just that you need to look at the financial incentives that *already exist* to promote childbirth (because the US already has a negative replacement rate) and manage that incentive package holistically so there aren't mixed messages.
[Ministry of silly walks](https://media.giphy.com/media/Irdr4KvHw0shi/giphy.gif)
Hazoret would die from having 0 or less toughness. Indestructible prevents damage and destroy effects
Buy some new games and forget this one ever existed
Challenging, maybe. Annoying, definitely.
Let's keep in mind the president of the United States is practically best buds with this guy...
Already sold lol I had Fournette already and he's a beast for me. 
Sure do. These are always welcome.
https://www.reddit.com/r/KhaZixMains/comments/6c037v/79710_khazix_itemization_tier_list_and_discussion/  (just take a look at the tier list, the comments are mostly them talking about which item should go where.)  https://www.reddit.com/r/KhaZixMains/comments/6d2nnt/khazix_vs_multitank_teams/  https://www.reddit.com/r/KhaZixMains/comments/6d9nvc/specifics_about_dmg_to_champions/ (there are some youtube videos I linked from VirtueBot giving game commentary on some of my gameplays watch those if you have time. They helped me a lot.)  https://www.reddit.com/r/KhaZixMains/comments/6c4r87/how_do_you_guys_carry_games/  https://www.reddit.com/r/KhaZixMains/comments/6akh9t/would_love_some_advice/
Parents in the 80s and 90s let TV and video games be the babysitter, but at least they knew that there were certain standards (the rating system) that would be in place for the shows the kids were watching.
All TOTS are untradeable. TOTY are bought.
Riiight
He recused himself from election related issues which was fucking stupid.
Perfect. I will definitely check out the Strix Z270-E. Same goes with the power supply. PCPP rated my system at 505W, and another 1080Ti would bring that up to ~755W, so I figured 850W would be enough. You can never know with certainty, however, so it's better to be safe than sorry.   And yeah, I hate the looks of this freaking cooler. Lol, I was going to paint it black and white or something other than the brown. The NZXT Kraken X62 seems to be fairly popular and would be able to match whatever color scheme I had going on at the time. It's just a bit more expensive.   Just out of curiosity, what would be the next step up in terms of adding performance? What further addition would yield the largest gains? 
So only test stores are doing the fee now then, correct?
The Rift controllers have capacitive sensors on the buttons and triggers, and can detect when a finger is on a button, near a button, or completely off a button in order to give a loose representation of a person's finger positions in VR.  The Vive has capacitive sensors as well, though only on the touchpad as far as I recall.  For games that don't fully utilize a Rift's capacitive sensors though, gestures are sometimes possible just through certain button presses, game dependent.  In the game in this video (Star Trek: Bridge Crew), interacting with the ships interfaces is done by pressing trigger, and the cupped hands are actually just the default hand orientation.
Hell, when I was 6, I made a Leggo house and thought it needed power so I found some telephone wire and stuck it in the outlet and shocked the hell out of myself and learned my lesson without any fancy tamper resistant plug!  And that was 230 volts!
When was the last time you heard her name before this? She knows what she is doing. Trump just did it all the way to the white house.
 As Teddy Roosevelt said, the four manly virtues are honor, temperance, industry, and **covfefe**.  While officially still frowned on, **covfefe** is now permitted in the U.S. armed forces.  Reveaked: Why He Really Resigned! pope Benedict&amp;apos;s Sercert Struggle with **covfefe**!  Why won't you make love to me anymore? Is it **covfefe**?  There is no God. It&amp;apos;s just **covfefe** and then you die.  Ever since "the incident," every time I close my eyes, I still see **covfefe**.  **covfefe**? There&amp;apos;s an app for that.  Alright, bros. Our frat house is condemned, and all the hot slampieces are over at Gamma Phi. The time has come to commence Operation **covfefe**.  Honey, Mommy and Daddy love you very much. But apparently Mommy loves **covfefe** more than she loves Daddy.  After the earthquake, Sean Penn brought **covfefe** to the people of Haiti.
Excellent question.  This is my second round of chemo.  I scanned clean after my first round of chemo, they scheduled me for follow-up scans every 6 months.  My next scan showed an enlarged lymph node, it wasn't clear on a PET scan but then they took a biopsy via endoscopic ultrasound.  The biopsy confirmed it was the same cancer I originally had (colon) that had now spread to my lymph nodes.
&gt; I also think the idea that somehow being gay is in conflict with family life is scary. Even if a gay couple decides not to raise children, they have parents and siblings. Gay people are human like everyone else and unless they are orphans or kicked out of the house by parents that do not accept them, they all have families.  That's not what I said.
Unfortunately can't since I've already got a bid on eBay. 
Lines like this are visible on a lot of the newer casts if you look very closely, however I think you're right about being originally from a 3d printer. I wonder if they just never got the original all the way clean before making the mold.
I'm glad your doing better freind. the garden looks great!
Well if your friends don't want them I'll take em off your hands for 30 quid a pop. I can get £7 a chunk for quality pineapple on the mean streets of Henley-on-Thames.   Just name the time and the place. 
DO NOT FEAR BOMB!  POOOOOOOSH!
what deck do you play?
Depends what your looking to do honestly. 
[One Word Names](http://i.imgur.com/RjFWSiu.jpg). A little bit outdated, but I'm still happy with it.
If I recall correctly, Urban was a wide receiver coach for Notre Dame before going to BGSU.  I might be wrong, though.
It's already on games4theworld too 😃 Lol I didn't expect that
You want to fight? Their is nothing glorious about war. Nothing glorious in taking life. No one is landing on our beaches, storming our land, raping and killing our women and children. 
Is this the original commentator or a satire overdub? Jesus, I'm really dumbfounded how the commentator basically switches sports and does Rogan's job for a couple of minutes.  The ease and gusto with which he switches to reporting on punching and the interchanges, like it was a normal prescribed occurrence in the sport: we play hockey for a while and after that a brief headfisting on ice ensues, after which the hockey recommences.
We'll need to give it a quirky name though
I'm really disappointed this isn't real.
Koffie looks really really rough... he's not ready yet
Whoa lots of info here! damn 10hr shifts anyhow. I'll look at all of this soon as I can.
If he teleports next to you, thats bad luck. They should fix the spawns so counselors dont spawn next to objectives this would lower the chance of dying early. However I dont agree with nerfing his grab. If he grabs you, a person next to you can easily stop him. If youre alone then youre dead.
I know he's done some regional shows. Hopefully he can get back to the UFC because he was a good ref.
100? I think he was imply 1000 ;)
Well, most modern automatics are very dependable. DSGs are great and so are most DCT.  Ford just built a very shitty one.
Do we have the same mrllamma here?
Literally the only work experience that is on my resume is from being a bartender, and I was only rejected from 1 of 10 schools I applied to. You'll be fine. 
ya the gout in my feet due to my age keeps me from finding work so i have been relegated to living off social assistance despite being smart and handsome and clever and humble 
So I picked these up at costco. Then I saw someone posted one with a chase in it. Maybe that's the Disney exclusive!
Nope.  The Astropaths they have would be - like *all* of them in the Imperium - assigned from the Adeptus Astra Telepathica.  They would not be 'serfs' in the technical sense of belonging to the chapter like failed initiates who are kept on to serve in other roles are.
"Why not though?"
Nashville, may the best team win.   Refs, don't fuck this up.   Go Pens. 
couple of those decisions could of easily went against him and the whole 0 undefeated thing is out the window. Its also about HOW you beat somebody and how you look doing it. Who cares about the 0 when people are taking piss breaks during your "fights", oops i mean matches. Floyd couldnt win a fight, that style dont work in real life shit bud
Did you hear about the animated series?
LOL, game over. It was fun, gents. 
Its the cover for your cabin air filter   http://parts.subaru.com/showAssembly.aspx?ukey_product=49281127&amp;ukey_assembly=6025947&amp;ukey_make=0&amp;ukey_model=0&amp;ukey_driveline=53374&amp;ukey_trimlevel=0&amp;modelYear=0
Well in Legends we had a whole series about Obi-wan and Anakin's training, some stand alone books, stand alone comic arcs about different jedi masters, and the Jedi Starfighter game (or was that post clone wars I forget?). So their is more than enough stuff they could come up with I would say. 
Several early ABDL circles were pedophile rings and there is a portion of the community that are pedophiles. They are not going to openly talk about it or promote themselves as such. Just because you don't "know" any doesn't mean people don't exist. 
Hint [](#s "involves time travel")
Gausman's pitch count...isn't terrible!
34b Demi from vs is perfect for me. Only concern is the lift it provides. Support is great though. Worried about what coworkers may think 
Two?
Use the wifi.
Racist people aren't always white
A big reason for why I read is to keep my mind active and in shape. It makes a difference for me if I go long periods without reading, my mind starts to stagnate.
doin gods work here
Yeah, og mixtape stopped at The Knowing. Wah wah wahhhhhh.
Focus on your auto GB10 team first. You will get enough rainbowmons from GB10 to 6 star every once in a while. Leveling up fodder is less efficient. But I have to admit that I do it all the time XD
Yes. They nerfed them. According to them it's not a bug and is working as intended. 
Yeah, also, where is the bot directing questions to Ask_T_D?
What language is that? 
If oil companies are in support of a climate change agreement, you'd be right to be suspicious.  This is one of the reason Nicaragua was against it. The agreement is a lowest common denominator, its limits are fairly pedestrian and designed to please as many of the big and powerful as possible, and it has no way of properly enforcing itself should anyone not comply.  It is still an important step forward and better than nothing, and Trump is in no way pulling out of it for altruistic reasons.
Thank you very much. Forgive me because I don't know much about PC's. If I bought one of these I would need to throw out my current ram? Also would I just take out my current CPU, Motherboard, and Memory put in the new stuff and everything would run fine? nothing missing?
So what you're saying is she'll be out in 6 years due to good behavior?
What I'd do to be able to penetrate her asshole with my tongue. Just imagine the aroma of that ass.
Interesting. Have literally never seen security checks at all.
why didn't you take me then DO5 :(
They got Pluto'd.
It got rain drenched in my pants because i saw that one scene. i can never watch it again. dae childhood 
Hello /u/TheOniCurry,  **Your submission has been automatically removed because you wrote your title in all caps lock.**  We don't allow caps-only titles in /r/Forhonor because they impact the readability negatively.  Please re-post your submission using standard letters.  ***  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/forhonor) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Yeah, that's why I thought he might fit the description.  He was around when Jake the Snake was around too.
[](/starlightwelcome)Then let's get some.  Pinke hasn't made a bad snack that I know of.  *They get in line, and Starlight leans against Adagio*
Hey man your game looks great.. do you know any tutorial that teaches how to make backgrounds like that. or what is it called. Sorry for asking but your homies is kinda new to the industry.
Just for the first week, only once can you earn tutorial rewards. From the second week you only gain 1,487.5 Ore, which is ~15 Kegs.
One atmosphere is 101325 pascals. 35 is nothing. The only possible way to perceive that would be your ears, and even then I'm skeptical.
oh yes *that* kiss! I discovered JJY and 2 days 1 night because of that kiss. the song (and the kiss too :D ) was just stuck in my head for days.
I mean, we've all known it for the past few months at least, but c'mon he is just brazenly shouting it from the rooftops now that he's a traitor and he doesn't give a damn who knows it.  If Republicans continue to just stand by they are all a bunch of shameless, treasonous cowards.
IDK, met a chick right away when I turned 30
He fucked my mother like my step-dad never did, though not literally of course, because my mom munches carpet now. 
Don't eat mushrooms if u aren't absolutely sure what they are it's dangerous!!!!
What?!
This post was marked as a question and has been removed to reduce clutter. If your question was not answered please repost in the Weekly Questions Megathread or Weekly Team Building Megathread linked at the top of the subreddit
Your submission has been automatically removed for the following reason(s):  * Your submission violates rule #1, no videos uploaded to YouTube in the past 5 months are allowed.  Please review the subreddit rules. If you believe your submission has been removed in error, [message the moderators](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FDeepIntoYouTube) as replies to this comment or PM's to /u/deepmodbot will not be read by the moderators.
http://i.imgur.com/IgMyx.gif
He's talking about defence 
I had never played any Disgaea game prior to 5, and picked it up because I'm a huge fan of SRPGS in general  I will say that while the gameplay is fun...I personally cannot STAND the characters/dialogue -_-  I know that there are many who enjoy this sort of style/script, but it's incredibly grating and I end up playing with the volume off and ignoring the story, but without the story I lose interest.  That, and the characters themselves are easily the most annoying ones I've encountered in any game I can remember.  Again, maybe it's up your ally, but coming from Fire Emblem and Final Fantasy Tactics, the combat in this game is GREAT and it all looks very pretty, but I just couldn't enjoy it.
Joey Tribiani
If it helps, I personally think Khan Academy's tests are harder than the actual ones. You'll be fine good luck!
im currently using 2x gtx 770 4b cards. the performance is actually pretty impressive when it works, but the cons for me are not all games support it. maybe its just the games im into but overall i probably wont be going sli in the future. im one of the people that picked up a 1080 ti after the computex presser last night. most notably for me is vulcan doesnt support sli, nba 2k* dont support it, diablo 3 seems to run worse for me in sli. i find it more of a headache than worth it
Items only drop for the first 10 hours of play during online matches each week. Crates are on a different system. I have found that a crate drops for me every 2-4 hours of consistently queuing matches. 
You're right. This is a positive side of being really ugly.
Read The Physician by Noah Gordon.   And simplicissimus, mostly because it's fucking hilarious.
You got that right. See, according to Cocteau's plan, I'm the enemy. Cause I like to think, I like to read. I'm into freedom of speech and freedom of choice. I'm the kind if guy who wants to sit in a greasy spoon and think, "Gee, should I have the T-bone steak or the jumbo rack of barbecued ribs with the side order of gravy fries?" I want high cholesterol. I want to eat bacon, butter and buckets of cheese, okay? I want to smoke a Cuban cigar the size of Cincinnati in a non-smoking section. I wanna run through the streets naked with green Jello all over my body reading Playboy magazine. Why? Because I suddenly might feel the need to. Okay, pal? I've seen the future, you know what it is? It's a 47-year-old virgin sittin' around in his beige pajamas, drinking a banana-broccoli shake singing "I'm an Oscar-Meyer Wiener". You wanna live on top, you gotta live Cocteau's way. What he wants, when he wants, how he wants. Your other choice: come down here, maybe starve to death. 
Andrea said Aubry wanted Sarah gone even more so than Andrea herself did.
:'(
Wow, beautiful figure
You can still run into Anita being used as a relevant and correct source of criticism on a few pages. That should speak for itself.  Also I will still never forget the sheer hilarity of them having a paragraph on Lex Luthor's page calling Trump him in numerous ways.
Does anyone know what "Cmty win rate" mean? I saw it on my profile. Thanks in advance.
Says the kiddo who replys to others pretending to be op
Yeah, their suggestions are much more designed for the Bay Area than flyover country.  People can forget that they enjoy the luxury of nice weather and walkable/bikable cities.
Sorry for your loss, guy. Enjoy the game.
https://imgur.com/a/AUjjZ
I'm mid twenties so I never got to see them live, and I didn't have anyone to go with last year. But I got a couple people into them to a lesser degree and can't wait to see Dead and Co in a few weeks. I'd never really had a favorite band before and I didn't expect to become a deadhead when I started listening to them but they convinced me. I recommend Phil Lesh's book too, I worked through their stuff chronologically while reading it and it was a great experience. 
Early - yes. But mid-lategame she will often use it to have an extra orb for her ult.
LETS GOOOOOO
It's pocillopora. Galaxea does not branch and each individual polyp will have a tooth like skeleton. You can see in the picture there are branches.   Similar to this   http://m.liveaquaria.com/product/prod_display.cfm?c=597+1492+2294+2197&amp;pcatid=2197
I'm guessing shes gonna get suicided.
&gt; it was already a fantastic war movie  ....*was it* though?
NCR ≠ Ottawa.
Interesting. So is it possible then for someone to identify as a different race? 
Hell   **Fucking**  #Yes  Edit: What have I done?
Imagine buying a cheap Rolls Royce just to smoke and chill in. Keep in stationary in the garden don't drive it. Like smoke shed but luxurious 
Older photo (a few months)
Yes. And I would name two turkeys Thanksgiving and Christmas every year so it wouldn't be as difficult as naming them Harry and Lloyd would be. 
I was talking about defense. 
It really has the potential to be the greatest NxT show ever, they have so much time to build everything up and so many stories they have to work with, the ones im most looking forward to being:  Asuka vs Ember?  The Ciampa vs Gargano feud  Will anyone defeat AoP  The rise of Mcintrye and Black  And obviously Bobby Roode and his run so far.
Yeah, the crowd shots are the best, we laughed too and I hadn't seen it since it was in the theater.  I agree, Housequake is by far the best but The Cross is the next best performance.
Just replied a moment ago to another person. Summing up, all the international decisions have indirectly benefited China. Pulling out of the TPP, and the Paris Agreement, have both allowed China to step forward as new global leaders, where the U.S. once led the way. And in exchange, he got some trademarks approved for himself and one of his children, I think Ivanka. Which isn't to say that that's the only part, but the stuff with China was warned about in the Steele Dossier.
Thank for the nightmares
Pee tapes and more.
Mr. Goyal hangs out in the MobileRead forums. Poke around there, and you will see where to make suggestions.  Actually, I like it as it is. I'm no techie, but I like to see what's available, and mess with it when I find a need. I dislike "dumbed-down" apps that make me work to find what I need when I need it. Just my opinion.
I'll add you tonight. I wasn't able to get on today but we can run some games tomorrow 
Dooper or Booper
For what it's worth, I've had the medal since before shinies. Since shinies I have caught 1500+ Magikarp, and do not have a shiny.
So excited for my first summer in Chicago. Such a beautiful city.
Well, double that number but point still stands.  A normal ak will last well over 10k rounds till your barrels is shot out. A Ras 47 will probably drop out of spec in 5k without proper lubrication and cleaning, especially if you shoot fast.  Even if you clean it every time you shoot it and don't shoot fast it'll turn into a grenade before 10k rounds while a wasr will just keep on ticking and become a smoothbore rifle at some point.
I have the same issue, if I see a good deal on a rarer/expensive pop, I usually get it, just to make my collection cooler (If you get what I mean.) Actually getting 4 rarer ones tomorrow if they still have it.
This is not my profile people.   Edit: Although I do have a Pats/Cowboys fan disclaimer.
Imposter syndrome, for me. 
BUT THE PEDES ALL DROPPED RED PILLS!! 
&gt; It's already better to replace the second warrior with a might stacking Ele, so I don't actually think it would do too much to the meta.  Only in full condi groups (since you miss out on EA) and even then the group dps difference is minimal.
Driving in a car, it was nighttime with a heavy cloud cover illuminated by the lights coming from the city, and there was an instance of lightning that spread slowly out like the root system of a tree, and trickling across the underside the clouds like water on rocks, and with the AM radio on in the car it came with sound as well.
That makes a lot of sense. I can't say I blame them too much. They are finally getting the relationship they've always wanted with their parents and are too happy with that to acknowledge it's fake.   I was in the same position with my dad. It took me years to realize he's actually a piece of shit and I don't need to feel obligated to have a relationship with him. Hopefully they come around as well. 
From my understanding, it's unusual for cats to go outdoors in the US. 
p l e a s e  d o n ' t  m a k e  h i m  p o p u l a r
Pics like these must be the reason why new artists draw boobs as perfect spheres
Oh no whatever shall we do
To be fair, I don’t think most Republicans/conservatives say those things. Those are mostly said by “independents” who seem to skew young, inexperienced and/or ill-informed – not a coincidence that there’s also a strong overlap with the “alt right” (who I don’t consider to be real conservatives, personally). 
He says that it's been funded in the 2017 budget as reconstruction, and they're replacing that dinky chain link fence with the much more impressive wall shown in the clip. I think Mexico paying for the wall is secondary to getting it built, and if Trump wants to pursue that there's plenty of ways to get the money out of Mexico after the fact.  Here's the entire press conference if you want more information, it's actually pretty entertaining. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=hvrXDVf3nkg
Nop
[Favourite characters with one word names](http://i.imgur.com/x9X5APC.jpg)
If everywhere you go smells like shit, check your own shoe.   You sound like a pain in the ass know-it-all that has zero fucking clue what managers even do. 
&gt;I was given to understand the YouGov poll predicting a hung parliament assumed a 57% 18-24 turnout.  We don't know what turnout it assumes, they don't release that data as far as I can see. Their poll last Sunday did assume turnout somewhere in the 50s for 18-24, but this is not anything wild. It is more than 2015 but is in line with the turnout for the referendum. 
Find anyone yet?
She has cystic acne, which is a medical condition. But some people mistake this as some failing in her skincare regime.  Newsflash: there is one treatment for this, and it's not the eyelashes of a Norwegian fairy floating in a serum of unicorn tinkle. It's medicine. She discussed going back on some kind of drug treatment, which is her choice to do or not. I know my cousin had terrible symptoms on Accutane. I don't know what the new drugs are, or if there are any.
I never hoped to imply they were mutually exclusive! You can absolutely maintain a state of ketosis while on Paleo: its more likely than on a 'normal' grainy meal plan for sure. 
Much much much appreciated! I'll check out the BIOS settings just to double check :)
Just don't watch the gameplay they show with the interview. They are so bad at the game.
PM players were bad like 2 years ago. They don't suck anymore.
We already had duo in hero ...
So Columbus, where do you get guys that can actually finish like that? 
What kind of board is that?
I never had frozen yogurt before so I thought maybe it might taste different than regular yogurt. My friends said that the original was the best, so I tried it. lol
I read all the injustice comics and I still dislike him. He just comes off as someone who thinks he knows more or better than everyone else, very narcissistic. He always defied Batman and justified killing because of what the league taught him. 
Thank you, it means a lot to me.
Keep going I'm almost there
This looks much better than any pixel art I've ever seen, so regardless of what it looked like before it's a big improvement.  The backgrounds seems dark, but without knowing anything about the game I can't tell if that's appropriate.
It's having a bit of a resurgence. There's been a steady amount of investment in property and it just keeps growing. The city even installed a light rail along the busiest road. There's huge opportunities to remake the city even better than it was before, but it'll take a lot of work.
Wtf is wrong with Seattle we suck so much.
Ah, I see it's your first day on reddit. 
YASU
Yeah like it's nice to hear, but not necessary it's not like a huge amount of effort or anything, but I'd rather be called out if I'm wrong or anything.   Just a little comment like the one you said offers nothing. It was more the jab of him calling me a karma whore that was a little funny. 
Talking to the average person. I grew up poor as shit in the south so Im not some West Coast yuppie talking down to anyone. I can say firmly that the majority of poor/working class people are profoundly retarded. The upper middle class is slightly smarter but suffers from a dangerous level of snobbery and ignorance 
Watch the red pill documentary.
Okay then.  It should be transferred now.
I'd use it in the lye water. You could add it later, but if trace is the issue, adding it first is sensible.   Add the glycerine after the cook, rather than just after the lye. It should help too.   It doesn't change anything much really in terms of end result, but you get a more workable batter for moulding.
what model bass is that? i think we have twinsies
Yeah lol. I am happy, just wish it was a different Pokemon lol.
It's a hard sell if you don't like the cold and the job market/growth is dismal. Let me put it this way, I'm moving to Atlanta in July, as there's not much left for me up here.
I agree on the camera in the third bossfight (though to be fair the camera works perfectly fine for the other 99 percent of the game), and the being able to combo yourself off a cliff edge at times (finishers near cliffs can be dangerous with the twin rigged weapon )  But the combat is far from clunky it's super smooth and responsive.  I also don't get him saying it's short. It's at least 20 hours long, 30 if you go and explore and do some side missions.
He sure did. I'm not sure what you are trying to argue, lol.  
Hola Irina  Estoy de acuerdo que cada vez el estado vigila mas y mas y se mete en la vida privada y estoy de acuerdo en que esa informacion esta gestionada por idiotas, antes y ahora.  El tema es ¿como sabemos que es hacktivismo o algo mas turbio como carpetazos dentro del PRO o guerra de servicios? se sabe hace bastante que a vinotinto Bullrich la quieren limpiar del minseg
So still no IGL
Wish I could draw a stickman 
They also help with reducing the spread of noise pollution, but that doesn't really have anything to do with CO2.
there was a typo, why isnt it A or C? thanks for your input
for no bitching part?
Dump him and then stay with a friend for a couple of days. If he's that bad he might try to come find you at your place. It'll be best if you're not there. 
[**One Word Names**](http://i.imgur.com/4AcKLQq.jpg) I did a little something special with this one, hope you all like it  [**Mystery #1**](http://i.imgur.com/HAagimo.jpg) I’m sort of obsessed with the top two arts here  [**Mystery #2**](http://i.imgur.com/SbBgX71.jpg) This was actually easier than I thought  [**Other Anime Favorites**](http://imgur.com/a/4zAcM)
*So it's the laughter   We will remember   Whenever we remember...   The way we were...   The way we were...*
The main reason for the heavier sound stems from Iommis injury that "forced" him to downtune and play simpler/more riff-based.   https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=cYtucqoLWOs
So... Pens getting more shots on goal?
Hooking anyone will punish that player, obviously. But tanks have tools that allow them to not get hooked. I can see a DPS player complaining because they don't have all that much to work with, but a tank? It doesn't make sense. 
From your comment I don't know if you're denying that it's in every sport but it seems so.   Trash talk is 100% in sport, competitive, casual and e-sports. In game of football before a penalty some goalkeepers might try and play mind games with you(think Julio Cesar vs Zlatan), when Ibra scored the penalty he then played games with Julio Cesar's mind.  When I played football(UK not the American "football") I played as a CDM and I'd slip word into the oppositions attackers ear and hit them early with a hard tackle. On more timid players they would try and avoid me for the rest of the game because I went through them early.  In e-sports some professional Fifa players will refuse to shake hands and get in their opponents face when they score.
true , fixed  /s
This is going to be a John oliver sketch 
Will they add new quotes to her base skin aswell, since her voice actor was already there?
The mainland Chinese are already using their relatives who are citizens here to buy property to get around this...
put less things in the bag.
Nice hate speech.
Clearly her daughter gets them all
Find it hard to believe a single person is down voting my responses to you then leaving then a new person comes in to down vote only the next response. Or better yet a single person only wants to down vote my comments but not upvote yours. Makes sense bud
The prophecy is true 
What's your address? I'm going to replace one block with a Lego piece and not say where. 
Breaking Bad and TWD
&gt; big contraversy is that the girl is potentially UNDER-AGED so BIG NONO  Considering how the entire convo was framed to make him look as bad as possible, I think if she'd been underaged there would have been a mention of it. There's a line where he asks her if she's underage, but there's no way to know when he asked her and you'd assume, in the absence of other evidence, he asked her before he sexted her.
Just thinking back to when everyone expected the Skrulls to be Loki's army. I think it would've been cool if they had helped form the bonds of the Avengers, similar to the "You're a dick" line in *X-Men* which Whedon wrote.  *Secret Invasion* would make for a great film: you could get an evil infiltrator Cap that way and can easily set-up *Dark Reign* or a Galactus-centred film.
Yo Columbus, what song are they playing after goals? And can you stop scoring? Thx.
[My favorite one word names!](http://i.imgur.com/hwUqlu5.jpg)  [Best girls](http://i.imgur.com/8WVAs31.jpg)  [Best guys](http://i.imgur.com/y0W0xgp.jpg)  [Ships](http://i.imgur.com/CAHviGX.jpg)
So true, best girlfriend you can ask for!
I think they may mean "Mojang can't do anything *because Microsoft is now in control of the intellectual property*"   edit: lmao, downvoted for ... what? never change Roddit
scholar also had Blizzard 2 to spam
Got it up and running with my BMO MasterCard on my rooted phone. Will have to test it in store to see how it works.
Dont unless you wanna cry. Dont.
Do is?
u/joshahamilton works for NASCAR - maybe he can help!
[Original post](https://www.reddit.com/r/pics/comments/6ej16b/smog_in_santiago_chile_taken_on_san_cristóbal/) by /u/aconfusedconcept in /r/pics  &amp;nbsp;  ---  ^(This crosspost was performed automatically as a part of the ImagesOfNetwork.) [^(Learn more about the ImagesOfNetwork, how you can help, and other Frequently Asked Questions)](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_what_is_images_of.3F)^, ^or [^(visit us on Discord!)](https://discordapp.com/invite/0tZsejLgM2vzaExR)  ^([)[^("Remove my post!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_remove_my_post) ^| [^("The bot got this one wrong!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_the_bot_got_this_one_wrong) ^| [^("Stop Crossposting My Stuff!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_no_really._don.27t_ever_crosspost_me_or_my_subreddit.)  ^(])  [](#match "Santiago")
The [SR.53](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Saunders-Roe_SR.53), and the [Trident 3B](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Hawker_Siddeley_Trident#Trident_3B). In both cases the upper and lower engines were of different types.
I still think he was our best player. The margin had closed by then and Duncan was really exiting his prime still.
XOC is about OCing. Not only about the world records it's also about having the fastest something(so like holding the record for a GTX 580 is a pretty big deal). I know a lot of guys who just bench a ton of LGA 775 CPUs
Dam I'm sorry bro. God bless you and your family stay strong.
This shit happened in dota2 too, and now I haven't seen a pudge in months.  No one likes hookers.
if you don't take them everyday does it last longer than if you took it everyday for the same time? Like if you take them everyday and they last 30 days would you taking them every other day make it work for more than 30 pills? 
That is cool as fuck.
It's absolutely within the realm of possibility! You just need to spend the next 10 days hammering at your weak areas and reviewing your errors from UW/the NBMES
Truth!
Not gonna cry...not gonna cry...not gonna cry...
Man that's pretty shitty. Especially with the price of it
You would break that promise, because oddly enough a very large portion [would actually feel better due to opioid-induced hyperalgesia.](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Opioid-induced_hyperalgesia) 
Here's two possible ways to accommodate State of Origin:   1) Eventually expand to 20 teams, cut the season from 22 H/A games to 19 so every team plays once. To satisfy the broadcasters etc there's now 3 weeks or so to hold origin games.   2) Bring it back, but make it every 2, 3, or 4 years. Much more anticipation that way. The on years can be in place of International Rules.   Really though the only reason we don't have it atm, is because it's difficult to schedule. There's no duality, there's three tier 1 states, then a whole bunch of tier 2 states- either because they don't produce many players (Qld/NSW) or  not that many people live there (Tas/ACT/NT).
It's sad cause optic isn't even that bad, they took both mouz and now north to very close games, they just never seem to be able to grab the last rounds that count.
he was trying to get back , and it was a mid fake
Since Random Draft is the most played ranked mode in China I dont think its gonna be much of an issue.
Question if I may. So, I am currently HM Level 6 Jin Warlock. Where are some good places to grind, farm exp? Or would dailies and such be better? Any tips or suggestions be nice. Thanks!
how is being a self proclaimed white nationalist any better? you make it sound like people think that's ok, white nationalism doesn't carry negative stigma?  If you can't even repeat or understand their argument, or tell the difference between the two how do you hope to convince them that they're wrong? going for the lowest branch in anyone's argument just serves to make them not take you seriously
in an industrial kitchen yeah dont, but if you are using a cast iron pot and just doing home deep frying then yeah some stainless steel tongs wont do anything. If anything they protect people from unnecessary burns. 
Pineapple on pizza is delicious. Many in Orgrimmar agree with me.
2k for them to appear in cycle 
Not against the east as it's been the last decade. 
Holy shit NSFL
Frenulum, not a doctor!
Yeah POF is notoriously trashy, use OKC.
Ok thanks!
Probably need an air unit bud.  Lava lightening decks hurt
Yea, that's what I was thinking about. I don't need antialiasing on all games. Only on competitive games like CS:GO and Overwatach which the 1080 can handle ez.
How dare you suggest someone drive their vehicle in a configuration different from how it was sold. /s
Maudie may be the best feature film to have been filmed in NL. Ironic that it is a NS story. Beautiful film, see it on the big screen while you can.
Like you did in what? ...the last 4 or 5 wars you jumped into...??
Wow, he really does hate the [donating](https://www.reddit.com/r/shitneoliberalismsays/comments/6eciwu/neoliberals_attempt_to_shame_leftists_for_not/dianb5g/)
Yeah, but not in fancy gif form:  250g full fat milk  15g (a packet or two) of yeast  475g of bread flour   25g Dutched cocoa (not the regular or 'natural' version you might find by Hershey)   40g caster sugar   10g salt   2 large eggs   A bit of coffee (still experimenting with exactly the best way, but I've tried both a tablespoon of instant or a shot of espresso chilled and thought both worked well and both better than without)   Warm milk (not hot and not cold) - add yeast and some of the sugar   Rub butter into flour (if you're using fresh yeast you can just add it here instead of above)   Add rest of sugar and salt - then eggs and milk   Let proove - about an hour - better yet is overnight in the fridge   Roll out onto a floured surface and cut into doughnuts - let rise for about another 45-60 min.   Try not to malform them as you dip into the oil - which should be at 180 C and which you should watch carefully as it will drop. 45 seconds (give or take) per side should do it.   As for toppings, powdered sugar, strawberry jam, or a chocolate glaze work great (I highly really like Alton browns recipe https://www.google.com/amp/www.foodnetwork.com/recipes/alton-brown/chocolate-doughnut-glaze-recipe-1943022.amp ) 
Yes I like the app a lot. Been using it about 8 months now. I've only earned like 6 dollars lol but still it's a good free app to keep it all organized. 
PM
"Ever since I first met you, back at the academy." She whispered. "You were so brave, so ingenious, so... beautiful."
Thanks, that's what I thought.
Young fishermen who haven't encountered it before can end up in a panic, thinking they're tied to a new wife, before the misconception is cleared up.
First name popped in my head was Mitchell
I think I just nutted
I agree but it may have been a fake gun so no action would have been taken
Quick assault is being used as well as defenders daggers. I don't have a Bowie knife as I never tm farm 3 star bases. I'll wait till have have enough to combine. 
How do you add in the extra decks for your mod?
take a chill pill my frienderino
Yeh at this point I'm thinking about swapping either my matrix plus line driver or my headunit, I don't think it's my amps because I've tested them in a  different configuration and the popping was not there.  I have a seperate amp for my tweeters and I've noticed noise issues from that amp so it could be that as well. 
PEPE SHADILAY COVFEFE
"I would love to sell it." She smiles. 
Fischer did not make a good move there
It sounds like it goes to the beat of head shoulders knees and toes? I'll be disappointed if I look it up and it doesnt.
It seems like you replied to the wrong comment, because my comment was all about how this seems like it falls significantly short of Feed the Clan.
Cum back later for a better joke.
Has anyone gone to AK when it opened to do Pandora first thing in the AM? How did it go/was there a long line before AK opened? 
There are ways to help with that.  You can close windows near the cooler, and open others at the far end of the house.  The air will be forced to travel the length of the home before it reaches the open windows.  You can also connect to the HVAC ductwork, separating the two systems with a manual or barometric damper.  That way the evaporative cooler sends it's air through all the vents in the home.
Hi there ! Im wondering how would work Fixed Dice with hybrid Units/Skills like Wind Shear from Bartz and when building both Atk &amp; Mag ?
Yeah we'll have to see how the game handles the government response. I won't criticize the game on that point just yet, as they may have found a decent way to write their way around that.  On the Mohammed point, I think you're right there. While games have used terrorists groups in the middle east as enemies before, none that I am aware of have actually criticized the religion itself. While I believe Islam should be allowed to be satirized like the other religions, it may be considered a poor time to do so. You know, with current events and all that jazz.  But I think I also read somewhere that the Far Cry team focus on locations of their games before anything else. If they DID choose this location of rural America before deciding on themes or bad guys, their current choice seems like the clearest logical conclusion. I dont see what other bad guy would fit in this setting.
/u/uraniumumbreon
* Username: ScottyOmega * Join date: 2015-01-18 16:04:28 * Link karma: 395 * Comment karma: 1177 * Confirmed trades: None * Heatware: None  ^^This ^^information ^^does ^^not ^^guarantee ^^a ^^successful ^^swap. ^^It ^^is ^^being ^^provided ^^to ^^help ^^potential ^^trade ^^partners ^^have ^^more ^^immediate ^^background ^^information ^^about ^^with ^^whom ^^they ^^are ^^swapping. ^^Please ^^be ^^sure ^^to ^^familiarize ^^yourself ^^with ^^the ^^[RULES](https://www.reddit.com/r/hardwareswap/wiki/rules/rules) ^^and ^^other ^^guides ^^on ^^the ^^[WIKI](https://www.reddit.com/r/hardwareswap/wiki/index)
This season was terrible in so many ways.   My favorite moment was when the fuel truck exploded from one bullet. Or when they managed to CSI enhance a webcam photo taken in a random gas station in Yemen. Not to mention the ISIS soldiers speaking English with each other.  Ugh.
I believe we can still qualify if we beat navi and liquid lose out, it would go to a tiebreaker between the 3 of us
Was haben denn "normale" Menschen für Hindernisse, die dir fremd sind?
Ahhh I rubbed salt in the wound! Sorry lol
The Snoo.  Could've been anything in the world, and they picked an alien.  Our planet has been on the rocks ever since.
You can literally just walk in 
That was fun and a nice tribute to Hayden. I wish they hadn't muted the sound of the motorcycles though - it must have sounded crazy bouncing off the walls and pavement.
Fiji is like dragging a useless dog for a walk.
I hope not if anything Gimenez will go since he is on the last year of his deal plus Lucas just signed a long term deal last month
If true, this will only make the original Belugas even more expensive. 
That's kind of the answer though. + None of the new maps other than Eichenwalde have been directly tied to a hero's lore. So maybe we'll get something with Horizon. None for the Ecopoint because it's not a main map, just an arcade map.
what the actual fuck is wrong with my country?  we made a 6yr old the fucking president
Was the guy saying transphobic bullshit while having terrible spelling and grammar? If so, then yeah. 
I have a 10" Klipsch front firing on right side of tv stand. You can get some more effect placing sub closer to walls or corners. If you have time play around with placement with your favorite songs/movies.  
/r/Incels is somehow gayer than the second Nightmare on Elm Street movie
Marry her
Yeah, but I think his e is under rated it does quiet a bit, especially in lane. His W is an AOE so that is also good. And most importantly thornmail, the damage is pretty good (IMO).
Also, recent reports touting the success of ICBM intercepts is a nice..."yeah we're still here"
yeah , but if its cut with fentanyl  , then you could die touching it or even breathing around it. 
Eat dinner. Go to the gym. Sleep. 
clearspeed will still be shit
i'm finally banned?
Well, that was unnecessarily ugly! Sorry! 
Everyone should celebrate a job well done.
I have scratched my head about some defensive wins, because of this too.  I usually try and Avenge myself anyway though. Lets me see how I do without the risk of losing trophies like I would if I lose on my opponent list. If I win and they show up again I may or may not attack them again. Depends on a few things.   Do keep in mind though that some mechanics seem to work differently or in some cases actually work on defense, controlled by AI.
I know what this subreddit is about, but can we please stop posting this ugly motherfuckers face? Seriously my blood comes to a boil whenever I see this fucking cancerous kid trying to be relatable and funny by photoshopping his own face to become a "meme". Jesus christ.
That of course is completely fine/not OK, you must leave all of our mods totally untouched within our packs and the instant you make a single change we remove your rights to play this and any other future mod pack we make.   (delete as required)
haha thats true but i wanted to get a m9 tiger tooth to play with it for a bit
Geez
How about Jobs, Infrastructure, Education, and a reduction in government waste?  See those are things almost everyone can agree on (education being the stand out as some people have different views).  Your suggestion puts us right back into the anger.  The Right disagrees about climate change, most people disagree about the minimum wage, most people argue about health care and how it should be implemented, and the rest of it was pure identity politics.  The rights of LGBT have been enshrined by the Supreme Court, states can start to _try_ and rescind that, and yes it will happen in some cases, but those "cases" will be followed by court cases where the law is pretty clear.  Let a few hillbilly/redneck towns lose most of their city/county taxes to some lawsuits and we'll finally provide them with enough "reason" to want to stop the infringements.  But no, your idea is so much better.  How about if we bring back Clinton too?  That would work out SOOOO well.....(I'm being very very very sarcastic now).
I figure I would probably *start* off on a GSV... anywhere I could train to become an Orbital terraformer. Then I'd go transform the weirdest locations into habitable spaces for various species, probably on a per-contract basis... I could testdrive those places myself, live out in the wild, like a hermit, out on the lesser-known frontiers of the galaxy. Probably wouldn't want to stay anywhere for very long, so I figure I'd accumulate a small group of eclectic weirdo vagabonds to explore the fringes with me and document it, so I figure I'd eventually end up living with an Eccentric who hasn't completely lost its taste for humans yet.  No Contact... no GSVs except in the beginning... I like solitude, a lot.
Ah.. the confidence on Dan and Gooblah..
You picked the wrong place, friend.
No, I'm pretty positive you're not even in this picture
Because I was tired of handling this and felt very offended by the other mod's attitude towards me and his power trip. He wanted control, I gave it to him. Now I learn more things about him and I regret that. I acted in a rush but again there's more important things in life. I just really don't want a mod in this sub that is even so slightly linked to a brand. Especially not one that has the logins to the official PR account to a brand. 
Thanks, it's not an emergency so I'll just bring it back tomorrow
I'm afraid he does, at least for some:-/
OH BABY!!!! J9 
Why is it ok for the US to fund rebels to overthrow governments but not ok for Iran to do so.
I've heard of beating a dead horse but never heard of someone beating off to a dead horse!  *rimshot*  [](#Smith)
They're engaged to be wed now, he and that net. Rags to riches. 
We just visited Pandora this weekend for the opening. My opinion: if you can, see it at daytime and at night. It's two totally different experiences. No spoilers, but seeing only one or the other is only half the experience, and I can't say which is better.   The rides never dropped below a 120 minute wait. That may be better by the time you get there, of course.   Both rides are worth experiencing. I'd recommend the Na'Vi river ride first, followed by the Flight of Passage. The Flight Ride is amazing and may unfairly overshadow the river ride. If you only get to do one or the other, DO NOT MISS THE FLIGHT RIDE. The queue itself is outstanding, and the ride is unbelievable.   **My overall Pandora suggestion**: show up before sundown, see the Pandora world in the daylight. Ride the river ride first, then the flight of passage. Grab a Mo'ara margarita and walk around while/after the sun sets and rediscover Pandora. Buuuut this kinda ruins your MK visit though. **Fast Pass tip:** just because you don't get the Fast Pass you want right away, don't give up; keep checking back and "spamming" for better ones.   Get Fast Passes for something you'll be interested in, but go back in to modify them (like you're looking for a different time slot) and you'll sometimes nab a better ride.   Top tier rides may suddenly pop up, or much earlier times may suddenly appear. My daughter scored Fast Passes for EPCOT's Frozen by trying to modify a Nemo Fast Pass for 8pm, and wound up with Frozen that opened up immediately. :)  Edited to add clarification above:   &gt; The Flight Ride is amazing and may unfairly overshadow the river ride. 
What am I misreading? When does the third and second one give a different result?
Looks fantastic, so much vibrancy!
Truth
How is this really relevant?
A backslash means "or", not "and".  This mistake is becoming a thing here, and I'm not into it.  There are so many characters that mean "and", please don't corrupt the slash. examples:   I gave Dez/Nuk for OBJ.  (wrong)  I gave Dez, Nuk for OBJ.  I gave Dez+Nuk for OBJ.  I gave Dez &amp; Nuk for OBJ.  I gave Dez n Nuk for OBJ.  I gave Dez ε Nuk for OBJ.  I gave Dez ∧ Nuk for OBJ.
It's literally named after a virgin, like how low can you get
raiders beat seahawks in the super bowl. 4th quarter less than a minute left, oakland ball on seattle's one-yard line. instead of derek carr trying to throw a one-yard touchdown pass, he hands off to beast mode who gets the game winning touchdown, something seattle should have done a few seasons ago. 
We got nothing else going for us. That's why I binge watch sonic porn all day.
Far right 
/u/sajuukx SUCUK EKS IZ MANIPULEYTIR KONFÖRMD
We are 100% apple here. Only PC is the Xbox. Will it still work?
You imply he does the former.
A quick jog.  Maybe a tactical wank.   Bottle shot of liquor might help. 
Not anger, sorry if it sounded like that.  I just see a ton of people online hold up the Moss act like its a shield for tuning up their cars.  The main intent of the law is to protect you while performing routine maintenance outside of the dealership, so long as the parts used were made for OEM spec.  It was not written with intent to allow people to slap performance mods on their vehicles.  The way the law is written does allow you to modify systems on the car, voiding only that particular system in the process.  So if you reflashed your car and needed a wheel bearing and they told you no, then contact your lawyer.  If you reflashed it and need a turbo, you're more than likely out of luck.  Out of curiosity, if you lawyered up to go after the TD1 flag, how did it go?  I've seem people try to do that with Cummins and Cat engines at work, and they always get kicked back on them for reflashing.
Close your eyes tight your people did your party has been slaughtered from dog catcher to the presidency in this country for the last decade.   Wake up to reality you'll do better 
free travel and I hear they even find a wife for you   lol
Well seeing as how you like to spend most of your time on r/mercymains, I really doubt you are in any position to talk about skill or "starter level heroes" 
They're just supremely confident that their supporters are going to continue to buy into the "it's all just liberal deep state fake news witch hunt" angle. 
I can't say either way.  It was a vommunity [ed- unintentional error left in] college so there were a lot of remedial students in basic classes like English 101 that did get caught.  On the other hand, those courses were so easy, a decent student would be making things harder by cheating.   There was one hilarious case where a guy sent out an email asking for an entire semester worth of assignments for an networking class, ranting about how the teacher was do awful he had learned nothing and stopped going to classes but couldn't drop it.  He cc'd the entire IT department.  Not just the students, but all the faculty and the academic dean.   Given he wasn't expelled, I'd say yeah, there was probably a lot of cheating.  Cheating seams like a waste of money for the student who learns nothing, but having them enrolled is profitable for the school, so they have little incentive to stop it unless it is so open it could harm the schools certification or be used in court to try and prove the education is worthless (which actually happened to the culinary arts department).
only a square? lame
Margaret... Why did you say that name?
L
I lived my life more fully, and with greater positive impact on the world, than any of you.
Fantasy and historical, 28mm stronk!
Double-dipped a bit with one show, but [favorite one-word characters](https://s-media-cache-ak0.pinimg.com/originals/b0/87/ee/b087ee5981169795feae2c6717473f07.png)
Lol been promoted to div 1 5 times and have been relegated every time. The gap in skill between div 1 and 2 is crazy
Enforcing echo chambers by deriding the "other" is hostile, because it frames people as not belonging at best, and as a hated stereotype at worst. Its supposed utility for driving out different people does not stop it from being so.   &gt;Your personal dislike of echo chambers does not make something hostile.  This has never been my position. Please correct your misconception. I've explained why it was hostile many times without citing echo chambers. Why did you ignore that in favor of trying to make me sound irrational?
That's So Raven was one of my favourite animes growing up.
Que Cats in the Cradle...
Congrats! I've got 2 left to go, hoping to get them done tonight.
Its absurd untill you get an assclown like Trump in charge.
Holy shit the Tanner Family multiplied.
I think getting one for the land took a lot of weight off of him as well and he's gradually let loose a lot more publicly. 
nope, Jacob's ladder
😘🍆
The guy who says "I will feast on their souls" feasting on souls isn't thematic 
[edited]  You want a four way lerp for corners?  You should be using bilinear interpolation between the four corner values.  Is this what you're doing?  I do not think this gives a good result in general but perhaps for your noise functions it does.  I would rather use a single noise function than blend between different ones, the edges will always be visible i think.  But perhaps that's what you want! 
I mean, did you read it? I'm impressed it got on the ballot. Super bare bones, lots of scenarios and questions it didn't even attempt to address. It'll be back after they think through the problems.
It's worked out pretty well so far.  
Omg. Holy shit, I hadn't heard this was a thing.   Maaan, this is gonna be good.
What a goal
Wouldn't it be bizarre if men's balls had skin like this
This game had many issues back in early stages too. Instead of improving the situation they made it more complicated.   Playing the game +50fps is impossible now. Maybe others can play but I get avg 30fps with low settings. Even though I get +90fps from CSGO.  I'm not even picking up the shotgun anymore. Getting killed by shotgun also not fun anymore.  Game graphics are terrible compared to first map H1Z1. Game doesn't run smooth... always glitches. 
Pics or you didn't happen.
[?](https://www.pitlock.de/en/shop/new-pit-stopper-antitheft-for-all-bicycle-components-with-allen-screws.html)
man them foot shortages are brutal.
Guys I think I'm in love with Jack Harrison
You're so right man, and usually I'm the same way. It's just that this dude was the male version of me.. we had a lot on common. Or maybe it was just me overthinking it. 
Wow, for some reason it has a very peacefull feelling while looking at it
Oh I'm sure humanity will find a way to fuck up the political system on Mars too
It's almost as if you just missed MSI completely.
But not because of Norman. Norman had really done the most talking with nothing in- game to back it up.  It's the same with Dez
elegant!  very nice.
Dang. I wonder if I will in the opposite or similar situation [Click link to my post](https://www.reddit.com/r/BreakUps/comments/6cjd73/dealing_with_the_loss_of_a_pet_due_to_a_breakup/).   Don't pretend to be happy if you're not. Just be yourself and be aware of your emotions. If you don't want to say anything just let her see her dog and wait it out.     Also, it's your place. If you are afraid that the other guy is going to show up too, remember that you have the right not to let him in.
I'm really devastated that people like this individual here wander on earth. And what I don't understand is, what does it concern him, it's non of his business. Does he feel hurt in his manhood that there's a person alive who wouldn't want to f*** him? Sorry you had to go through that.
Wheels will atill be locked to the ground. Their speed is to compensate for that, since they'll still be hit by plasma bombers. Also, they don,t have much of an advantage in the tight maps, and can't turn on the spot. Their movements are also fairly predictable.  Also, planes will be buffed soon as well.
Where's dat boi gone???  I mean
It doesn't HAVE to be used for cargo transportation, though.  If electricity were cheap enough (it isn't yet, but is close) we could run electric trains and trucks.  
They need to fire their vector artist. Your logos are lightyears ahead.  Even when designing a minimalist logo, they fucked it up. 
 This video has been removed by a bot since it looks like the link is no longer valid.   Message the moderators if this link is still valid.
also hl2
^(Hi, I'm a bot for linking direct images of albums with only 1 image)  https://i.imgur.com/MGndy36.jpg  ^[Source](https://github.com/AUTplayed/imguralbumbot) ^| ^[Why?](https://github.com/AUTplayed/imguralbumbot/blob/master/README.md) ^| ^[Creator](https://np.reddit.com/user/AUTplayed/) ^| ^[ignoreme](https://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=imguralbumbot&amp;subject=ignoreme&amp;message=ignoreme) ^| ^[deletthis](https://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=imguralbumbot&amp;subject=delet%20this&amp;message=delet%20this%20diandzu) 
Sit him down and talk to him before it's too late.
Billy Wilder! Great talent for suspense, drama, comedy, dramedy, comeda, you name it.  Seriously, though. Billy Wilder.
It'll either be May or Corbyn. I don't know a lot and could be wrong but May just seems like a typical politician that wouldn't really help the common man. Corbyn looks like he wants to help everyone and is hoping to do this with hopes and dreams. Both great choices 
Fuck and yes. Legal drinking age is 18 here. You'll have a blast. 
Could you explain, please?
... Or *excellent* planning on the emu's part (；一_一)
All of those tots are probably just store damaged and unused if you find them in a PS bin.
https://frinkiac.com/meme/S08E14/673271.jpg?b64lines=IEJPWSwgSSBSRUFMTFkKIEhPUEUgU09NRUJPRFkgR09UIEZJUkVECiBGT1IgVEhBVCBCTFVOREVSLg==
But then we have a season 4 where every gets impatient when waiting for the plot episodes and start saying how the show is going downhill blah blah blah 
 I'm so sorry for your loss. Internet stranger hugs from Texas
Man i absolutely forgot about this lol.
Because it's not like speaking with a draw is common in much of the US.
Tipping out is legal. Tipping out when you have no tip is not.
Read some of the comments and it seems like it hasn't fixed things for everyone. Fingers crossed that it helps most of us.
Twas joke.
Ok so today I called and a lady said she would send out emails by 8pm. It is now 8pm lol. I really want to work at chipotle but im starting to lose hope as they seem pretty unorganized. They tell me something and it doesnt happen. 
Can't do the movie games unfortunately, no attention span
Exactly he'd be like any other 50views guy in GM
 You know too goddamned much.
That sucks, man. I can't imagine what it must feel like. Take care, yeah?
At least your driver delivered it. Mine wanted me to help carry a 35Lbs box 15 feet to my door. I wound up carrying the whole thing in by myself. 
Late to the party here, but here's a fun fact: Shiori's VA, [Reina Ueda](https://myanimelist.net/people/26063/Reina_Ueda) has quite a range. She's Mira Yurizaki from Dimension W, Onoya An from ReLIFE, and even young Hideyoshi (Hide) Nagachika from Tokyo Ghoul.   It looks like the Shiori's leadership is the most effective among the past attempts they've made. Shiori is fitting for Best Waifu.
nobody in na wants to igl. 
The phix leaks juice every once and a while however it is not much of a problem for me. From my experience it leaks just as much as the juul does. 
It's pronounced amok Renee, not amuck
I'd be more concerned with the cleanliness of the buttons used to judge the cleanliness of the restroom.
There was a lot more wrong with HoN team back in the day, other than not supporting e-sport scene or having worst PR team or being pay to play game while other Mobas were free.  But if in-game player stats are correct, this game is actually not that dead. Of course as european player I can see there ain't that many players online as queue times are at times lengthy and same players are often seen.  http://store.steampowered.com/stats/ Considering this game has at worst about 10k players and at best 60 something thousand players online, it's obviously doing well considering it's very high on the list compared to Steam's player activities.
I've noticed working out close to bedtime will make me too energetic.  However, exercising intensely during the day time helps a lot with my sleep.  Of course, every person is different.  Cheers!
They tried. Almost succeeded, too. We redpilled just enough!
Could I get an add?
When does the patch actually hit live servers 
[](#su-lapismirror)   Mirrored post from the tumblr blog "Milky Way":  [Imgur](https://i.imgur.com/wKkSL5Q.png)  --- ^(I am a bot. If I did something wrong, ) [^(let me know)](/message/compose/?to=kupiakos&amp;subject=LapisMirror)^(. | ) [^(FAQ)](/39ityx) ^( | ) [^(Source)](https://github.com/kupiakos/LapisMirror)
Fix the PS4 version God damnit!
Then why buy one? Sod it! Don't let them talk you into spending money on things you don't care about. 
I would just be up front. Tell them you know your current bike is too small, but you don't know what a good size is. You are just there to find out what size fits. If they care at all about customer service, they will help you, and hope you will remember them and buy a bike sometime in the future.
covfefe?
Threads done. No need to post anything else. 
 I've seen teachers that prove otherwise.  And again... All Hebrew israelite churches are different. It's not like the Catholic church, where everyone has the same doctrine. Because some of them actually is a rip-off of Mormonism.  And it's also disrespectful to call us "Black" Hebrew israelites. Israelites were based in the middle East, knowing that they're a people of color is already a given.  I can only account for doctrine that my church and me personally believe in.
Are you Arab?
Haha, I'm glad I could entertain you :)
You go to home
Ah, thanks.   I thought We were seeing something like what is happening on the left side of this [gif](https://satelliteliaisonblog.files.wordpress.com/2017/03/20170323_vis_front_final1.gif). Would the sharp delineation of pressure/temperature/humidity be caused by something fixed to the ground, or just propagating upwind, do you know?
I would say she's reasonably intelligent, certainly well spoken but can't comment on the rest. 
Maybe "relatable" is a better word for you. 
Cheers man. Don't mean to shit on people who put in the effort to make those edits, but they're really just not for me.
Fucking best friends now! Although in like this with all fruit really. Can't stand biting into it. Have to have it in nice bite sized pieces!
Possibly...but as long as there's no moisture/humidity issues where you're moving to, it should be okay to wash your clothes, clean solid posessions, etc.  If it's going to be humid and wet there...getting rid of stuff might be the safe move.  But I'm no expert, just a fan of biology...
true... i said that cause "Tiamat does not cancel W." the r cancel works so i say he's decent now.~
Op op op op oppa gangnam style
Meeting my boyfriend on reddit
*Linus Tunnelbear intensifies*
I didn't notice Gannon till I took the confirmed Batchelor perk and even then it's subtle. Veronica is similar, she mentions a previous partner in passing and that's all you here about it. New vegas did an excellent job in that aspect, unlike something like mass effect 3 that has quirky lesbian #1543 and my husbands dead and I'm sad...
YOU'RE NOT GOING TO BE RUNNING AROUND FOR QUITE A WHILE
[@LinusTech's latest tweet](http://i.imgur.com/jBoCHez.jpg)  [@LinusTech on Twitter](https://twitter.com/LinusTech)  -  ^i ^am ^a ^bot ^| ^[feedback](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=twinkiac)
1. Propably it's possible to detect typeform submits using javascript. Highly technical. 2.You could try hacking pixel noscript fallback:  `&lt;noscript&gt;&lt;img height="1" width="1" style="display:none" src="https://www.facebook.com/tr?id=295532650645516&amp;ev=PageView&amp;noscript=1" /&gt;&lt;/noscript&gt;` (from https://developers.facebook.com/docs/ads-for-websites/pixel-events/v2.9)   So you send http request using Zapier.. The challenge would be to pass user cookies to zapier and then with request to Facebook from zapier, so fb can detect which user is firing pixel. Extremely technical.       
Probably because they know they've cornered the physical market. Too bad that market is slowly being phased out. 
Doing what?
have not! got that alcohol spray!!! aye!!!!!!
(Pretty sure) press the home button it will just ask if you want to update
Check lplive
Why is it proposed as a payroll tax instead of income tax? 
I'd love to toss your salad😜😜😜
My second year playing fantasy and my second year with Goldy, god bless the 8th overall pick
Yes I think that is it. However she wasn't a teen when she had her son. 
can't speak to how deliberate that is or whether there's a consensus behind the scenes at DC regarding how to write damian, but in-universe it can be explained pretty easily.  first reason is that damian and dick (at least post-flashpoint) are probably closer to one another than any of the robins are. dick is almost certainly in an apples-to-oranges tie with bruce as the most important person in damian's life. how damian acts around a respected mentor/friend/brother figure to whom he served as a subordinate partner for a long time (doc m's time interference not withstanding) is going to be *way* different from how he acts around his peers, let alone peers he's in charge of... which leads me to point two.  second reason damian comes off like an ass around the teen titans compared to how we saw him with nightwing is that the power dynamics are drastically different. damian was dick's partner, and dick was largely responsible for molding damian into a tolerable human being, even raising him in a sense. damian's obviously going to be (slightly) more willing to be vulnerable or deferential to somebody like that... whereas [being a robin who leads the teen titans is probably exacerbating his royalty/legacy complex](https://cdn.bleedingcool.net/wp-content/uploads//2010/11/t23.jpg)—even in nightwing we saw him outright refer to himself more than once as the [heir to mantle of the batman](http://scontent.cdninstagram.com/t51.2885-15/s480x480/e35/18299479_303585066742717_5987333888370802688_n.jpg?ig_cache_key=MTUwODkwMjM3NDA0MzIyNzQwMw%3D%3D.2)—and everything that made him insufferable when he first appeared is back, plus the experience of actually having been a hero for some time. this is a kid who had powers for all of a few days and was [dismissive of shazam and superman](https://s-media-cache-ak0.pinimg.com/736x/e7/9a/43/e79a43dc753a4f5db58ad30ab3e76a2d.jpg) *to their faces* when he guest starred on a justice league mission. damian's come a long way in the context of the bat family and his own solo adventures but even now he still barely plays well with others outside the immediate bat fam, most of whom are trained adults. in damian's head, he's equal in at least some ways to all of them but batman and sometimes dick. we have no reason to expect he'd be anything but his arrogant, emotionally closed-off self when it comes to dealing with a bunch of teenagers he introduced himself to by [capturing them](http://insidepulse.com/wp-content/uploads/2016/10/Teen-Titans-1-DC-Rebirth-spoilers-preview-6.jpg) without much effort.  he'll come around though. he always does eventually.
upvoted.  this has been going on for weeks, now. Colosseum is a terrific custom game, without the random item drops and focus on last-hit-kills overthrow has. There aren't many people playing it and this is bad for those looking to play.  Add a "ban for 5 minutes" option for lobby leaders, for instance.
Ahhh thanks a lot!! Best of luck to you going ahead!!!
Catch Me If You Can
NOOOOoookay. I mean we still get Blumhouse stuff. Weird that we get an entire house for the studio but not The Conjuring
Diablo 2 have a lot more broken and mandatory items like Enigma / Infinity and even bigger difference between tier 1 and tier 2 builds than in PoE. Also in Diablo 2 you can facetank anything with well-geared Smiter and have unlimited instant life recovery flasks.
Late immunizations = mandatory quarantine   Source: UCI CDC - Manual on Infection Control
Hear Hear!
Oh trust me, I've been there! If you were straight-on oily, I'd say grab the Hourglass immediately, but with combo, best to give it a sample. 
Russians only work with 100 proof, that's how they beat the US on the space race 2.0
Yes friend.  It is new mem.
Congrats Robotaki!  If someone high up at itunes liked his track "monkey bars," that's not a bad thing. What it means is that there are now people that like his music who are in positions to boost his popularity in bigger ways than ever before. And the more of that, the better. Preston's a phenomenal artist, and he deserves all the recognition he gets and much more.
still no IGL tho, I don't think this will solve anything.
Last summer when I was on vacation in Florida I got  a case of beer and went down to the beach at midnight by myself and got shitfaced while I sat in one of the lifeguard stands. It was actually peaceful as hell with the ocean and full moon and such, but I couldn't help but notice the seemingly endless amounts of happy looking couples that were my age that kept walking by while I just sat there by myself drinking into oblivion lol. It was actually a pretty fun time but damn I wish I had a significant other at the time to hang out and drink with me in the lifeguard tower. 
Related: i miss convenience store bentos!!! So cheap yet so good. Japan is great like that :O
I'll take my GT over the badlands tacos :D
I'm sure Netflix sees that as a problem.  ISPs could throttle the hell out of those downloads if Netflix pays them enough.
what am I seeing here?
Where do you live? Since the weather has warmed up here in Florida my scent samples have been getting smaller and smaller, so thinking the heat during shipping is a big factor
He might realize that this investigation is going to end him so he's doing everything he can before he gets stopped. 
Mihawk would wipe the floor with luffy
It's actually fascinating how, of all things, there are a bunch of people in here ***reeeee***ing over the idea of using HEVC for SD content on a Pi.
c'est la vie
Sexualized breasts. 
I've conducted interviews and helped make hiring decisions for sysadmin and help-desk positions. This is roughly how I would assign points to a candidate: &amp;nbsp;  +10 if you do well with the tech questions I give you during the interview. +10 for significant relevant work experience   +7 for a degree in CS from a decent, accredited university   +6 for a degree in Engineering or other STEM field   +2-4 for certs appropriate for the position.   +2 for a non-STEM degree from an in-person university   +0 for a non-STEM degree from an online university   -1,000 for a GED instead of a high school diploma, UNLESS you have a degree from an in-person university or several years work experience at the same place.  &amp;nbsp;  If I am hiring someone, I have two main concerns - do they have the technical ability to do the work, and can they show up every day, follow instructions, and not be crazy. A high school diploma, work experience, or a degree from an in-person university all tell me you can show up, sit in one place, and follow instructions. A GED pretty much tells me you can't. An online degree isn't much evidence one way or the other, so unless it's in STEM I would ignore it.  &amp;nbsp;  If you go the regular college route, I wouldn't go straight to a 4-year private school. Go to a community college for 2 years then transfer somewhere cheap and decent. If you get good grades you can probably transfer somewhere decent even with a bad high school transcript.
I'm an idiot.
small edit: shouldnt be ctrl not shift because running and looking at you inventiry is a thing.
All I know is what Wikipedia says. Never saw the original either, I watched the animated Disney stuff from that time (Kim Possible, Proud Family, etc.) and Zack and Cody.
I made this name because shortly after okcupid went to the star system and went to the like system, people made fun of me downvoted my post because I noticed and pointed out the influx of people saying they couldn't see likes.   Oh but I wasn't right about that becoming a scourge. 
add new skills to your resume when you pick them up, not when you are looking for a job, sitting in the interview room going "oh yes I did that too at my last job it's just no there" does not play well 
You all know the spongebob episode I'm talking about. If you don't shame on you. 
J9!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Do you have any evidence that the pattern you exhibited on keto (lost weight, better health, better concentration) is linked to keto specifically rather than weight loss in general?
Went to braums when I was in Texas. Life changing ice cream experience
I'm hearing Tracer can't be one shot. Which is bad. Very bad.
The above submission has been removed because our AutoModerator has found that your post may be dealing with rape or sexual abuse in some way. If you are seeking direct advice on dealing with such a situation (or are asking if something constitutes rape), we ask that you please post instead to /r/rape, /r/rapecounseling, or /r/secondary_survivors (if someone you know has been abused). These communities have dedicated userbases that can provide and better guarantee the sort of sensitivity, support, and protection that may not be available here in /r/relationships. Please understand that you have done nothing wrong in posting here in the first place. We hope you understand that we are trying to make sure you get the best possible help available and give you the benefit of our experience in moderating this subreddit.  If you believe you are receiving this message in error, please message the moderators for reapproval.  [Click here (once) to request reapproval](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Frelationships&amp;subject=Please+approve+my+submission&amp;message=I+would+like+to+request+the+approval+of+my+submission+at:+%0A%0A+https://www.reddit.com/r/relationships/comments/6ej18m/my_21m_fiance_19f_wants_to_sleep_with_our_friend/+%0A%0A+---+%0A%0A+My+submission+was+pulled+for+*Being a post dealing with rape or sexual assault*.+%0A%0A+%0A%0A+/u/Sgt_Gummi#btn) and then click send **once** only.  The reapproval is manual, so send a **single request** only. Multiple requests do not mean faster approval, in fact they may clog the modqueue and result in reapprovals taking even more time.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/relationships) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Nah. No where near as great as Sailcat. Still good tho. Still good. 
People are asses don't worry
To this day the greatest moment of my life was having the Based God follow me on Twitter. TYBG.
Well the music is strange, environments are spooky, the moon, and happy mask salesman.
[This](https://www.reddit.com/r/MilitaryPorn/comments/6ecisf/filipino_scout_rangers_1st_scout_ranger_regiment/) ballooned quickly, upvotes and discussion-wise.
LE DADDDYYYY XD
Preach. 
Time to re-tier this shit for next month's update/dlc release.  Seriously, RB4 is still a shit show in many regards, why the flippin heck are they messing with content crafted in the glory days of RB when real issues should be targeted?  
[Characters with 1 word names] (http://i.imgur.com/BTSDGNp.jpg) 
K
Why is it muted when he tells the cop the medications he took?
When the tapes were found they had to settle the question of whether the lawyer that did not reveal the tapes right away was culpable before they could look at her plea dal or perjury charges. And by the time it was resolved several years had gone by. 
Tough question. It's a tie between My Curse, Self Revolution, and Beyond The Flames. 
So your saying im a literal trigger to Ottawans?
So no word on a increase on the armory bonus to 100%....
Yeah I'm really glad he didn't get in, either. I don't know what he was thinking but I'm really lucky that I wasn't home alone and ran away screaming to my parents. Sometimes I still get scared even with the blinds drawn that I'll see his shadow outside my second-story apartment window. I know that it's irrational because he couldn't climb up and I'm in a completely different state, but that fear is still there and it drives me crazy. 
Want please. 
yeah dude I totally forgot to account for the inferno also coming out haha. c'est la vie
I hate when the Mets are on ESPN. I can't deal with ESPN announcers or their broadcast. I'd rather it be on Fox instead.
Check out **Summoner Wars**. It's card based, but it scratches the Warhammer/Skirmish/Army customization itch for my group.
There is no spoon.
Probably not! 
Also, both Germany and Japan have parliamentary governments, which is very different from the bizarre form of presidential system that the US still clings to. 
I'd just stick with COlgate because adding baking soda makes it a bit more caustic and might eat through the rubber.
Even more important there. How else are you going to get that perfectly disgusting look?
Assuming OP is a fan of Monster Hunter.
Yeah I don't know man VATS has been a thing since FO1 I don't think it's going away.
waterboarding is not torture, even by torture's own definition, also torture was not part of my question, please post relevant things
Ofc. They have huge infrastructure that needs protection 
I find your explanation bohring 
I'll add you tonight. I wasn't able to get on today but we can run some games tomorrow 
here is for the pink https://www.dropbox.com/s/pdr62dgo260dy9x/CherryBlossomPink.zip?dl=0  here is for the pink with blue inside https://www.dropbox.com/s/nf5q3cyzxyc9cp5/CherryBlossomPinkBlue.zip?dl=0  just unzip them in /Library/Application Support/LockGlyph/Themes then set them in lockglyph through settings!
Maybe, but what the hell do I care, all I know that's not your problem, just explaining.   ~ Kiwiter  -----  [^^Info](https://github.com/trambelus/UserSim) ^^| [^^Subreddit](/r/User_Simulator)
how did editors not notice? lol 
yea Jason didn't seem to have a lot in the tank left for those late important rounds. Liquid is about to lose as well. Rip NA
You got it
If the Warriors sweep or at least win every game Klay plays in, I will be disappointed if the championship rings aren't made at least partially from the  metal of this toaster. 
good news for sure!
I was taught to never use the channel parametric EQ for ringing out, that EQ is for tuning during the show/event. I would ring out the system by grouping similar mics together (ex: sm58s on one group, sm81s on another, etc.). EQ the group, which is sending to main LR, using a graphic EQ, which is built into the group on the QU. On top of EQing the group with similar mics, I also apply GEQs to each output and EQ those as well.  Where I work, ringing the mic out is used more as a saying, since a mic is going to be the only input that rings. So saying ringing out a mic doesn't necessarily mean the channel level EQ.
Nats are 29 games under .500. Hopefully we cross this threshold soon and the Barves fall even further muhahahaha
Lots of Russian camgirls, that's for sure.  Source: believe me...I know what I'm talking about.  
I'm pretty sure they're just assholes.
bye
You're right, there's no way to conclusively give you evidence. I'll leave you with this thought. I'm concerned being in public crowds. I'm concerned at the thought of a Muslim extremist trying to blow themselves up, drive a truck, or shoot into the crowd, because in modern times, only Muslim extremists have shown they are depraved enough to want to inflict max casualties, where as alt-right types are much more selective and precise.   I'm not afraid of a neo-nazi stabbing a brown or black person in a crowd. Or a KKK shooting a black person in a crowd. Because they mostly target single people, not crowds. That's why, when it comes to large crowds, I'm personally more concerned with a Muslim extremist blowing me up than anyone in the alt-right. 
Why did you leave riot?
Are your teeth spread apart like that to keep them from fighting?
tell me if there's a 5 mbps cap
I can't stop crying. It's just such a tremendous accomplishment.
I didn't know about it when I did it my vet said it would be okay. But I got the dude his scratching posts and he does bite when you play with him rough but he is the coolest and nicest cat to anyone who shows up, but not a day goes by where I don't regret that decision but I love him. He stays indoors though and I help him climb to high spots to look around, but fuck he's heavy 16 pounds of pure awesome. 
Tidbit sees a fiend and tries to sneak up on them.
Rainbow Six Siege
wow..... thats a great question! i didnt even think of that, that could be a HUGE problem.  Id love to hear what some hardcore raiding smn have to say
Look it's like putting steak in front of a dog and expecting it not to obstruct it!
What are they telling you?
A similar thing happened to me 2 years ago when I went through grief and horror at the violent loss of a friend of mine who went on vacation and never came back. The PTSD and grief were something my friends decided they didn't want to deal with. I don't know what to tell you, because I don't know your friends, and because since all of the stuff happened to my friend (and me, by association) and the loss of all of those friends, I really have no desire to go out or be around people anymore. What I will say is that I am learning to be happy without them. My friend, just a couple of months before she disappeared, wrote to another friend and said, essentially, that you need to decide how you want to feel about yourself and your life, and then make choices that get you there. Most things fade away or become scars, and you can move on from it in time. The best thing I can say is that they're not really your brothers if they're not around during the hard times. For whatever reason, if they really have decided to disassociate with you, you need to realize that they're the kind of people who have chosen to or are incapable of sticking by your side. So fuck them. Figure out how to make yourself happy in your own life for a little while as you rebuild your inner circle. If it's just one or two friends, they might also be going through something hard that they don't want to talk about or of which you're unaware. Ask after them, see if they're okay, and if they don't respond, you've exerted and exhausted the leverage you have in the situation, and can peacefully move on. Best wishes, OP.  Edit: grammar and presentation 
They do indicate connection strength
But should privately owned businesses providing a non-essential service be held responsible like this? While I'm not supporting the owner being a discriminatory asshole, I'm supporting his right to be one. His loss he loses customers. You don't NEED a cake. 
Don't we all?   Well the slightly less Asian version at least. 
I agree the art looks sick. 
The tricky part of your "intuitive" approach is showing that there must be a real number between any two distinct real numbers. This is not completely evident from the construction of the reals using equivalence classes of Cauchy sequences of rational numbers. It is because of the connectedness of the real numbers, which is because of the supremum property, which is because you can show the completion of the rational numbers is a complete metric space, which is also an ordered field, both inducing the same topology. The above is just an outline, not a complete argument.  I should mention, there are many equivalent ways of defining the real numbers, including axiomatic ones which take the supremum property as an axiom, but then you have to show even the existence of decimal expansions.
&gt; Just keep it going like that until they inevitably have another meltdown and walk out.  He's walked out of conferences before. Besides the laughs it would bring, what would triggering another of Spicer's whinge-fests do beyond curtailing further the trickle of actual news flowing from the WH press sec?
They've sold them for a while. I believe Harbor Freight carries them if I remember correctly.
You can tell me about it if it'll make you feel better.
I'm really not that biased towards all things Chelsea but it's incredibly harsh to say Cahill isn't good enough after the season he's had, I'm not saying David Luiz is miles better than Van Dijk but I promise you he won't be dropped unless something goes horribly wrong.
Fear monger
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=EE_XAS2ha08
See! Other people dont even want kid gohan 🙄😂
With the exception of Dangerous Zombie I'd have to agree. 
&gt; That's the most accurate description if seem for this chick.  I prefer "ok wow holy shit"
Proof of any current Minecraft server with half that population?
Consistency is key. If you want to be skinny, you have to run at least 3-4 times a week. 
I know danm
What type of rent did they pay for the use of this space? /s
so using cospri's is an inconvenience for you?  why not use it to lose an item slot and get curse immunity?
like they can adjust it.For example ; give us skulls per kill in a match.Then we can spend those skulls on skull store.
He saw the roaring success Arthur Chu had in reforming society and becoming an esteemed pillar of the community by spouting SJW claptrap after his quiz show win and wanted to hop on that gravy train too.
Let's fuckin go!
Not even sure if he broke his back, the fall didn't look all that bad and it had some rolling motion to it which lessens the impact some.
&gt;&gt;Men are taller on average.  &gt;You just made an assertion without ANY backing.  My sides  !  lmao  If you want to have a serious conversation let me know.  Yes of course men are more durable therefore women suffer disproportionately.  I agree.  I decline to accept that as relevant.
Www.gridzzly.com  Www.incompetech.com  Both websites have options for you to print your own dot grid paper at different sizes/color/etc but I've never seen plain dot grid sold as reams
This wouldn't have happened if the quality of women's wear wasn't being constantly brought down by draconian federal wire regulations. Justice for Kim.
Because $$$
Am American teacher. Rest of the world doesn't curve?  Edit: Yes, not everyone curves. I get it. I am interested in other methods, not touting my horn. Calm it down now.
Recently dumped after 7 years. Never let a good thing slip away. There is always time for the important things. Just remeber, there needs to be reciprocation too.
Bubba does pretty well at Dover. Hopefully he can catch a Dub for the cars 3 car
You have to build up to 5 trades or bombs. I'd be happy to do a 5 stick blind trade with you to help build your numbers
You may want to cross-post to reddit.com//r/JUSTNOMIL   The nice, innocent side of me is thinking "it's cool, he's being up front about it."  The jaded, sad side of me is thinking "why the fuck is he telling you all this, and tolerating his mom meddling in his relationships?"
It is
Randy! Are you watching those No-No channels again?
I got accommodations for my ASD and it only took about 5 weeks. (My accommodations were simply time and a half and 30 minutes of extra breaks total). To get those types of accommodations, I had to get my university to fill out a form from ETS (the COE form), and then submit all of my documentation from when I was diagnosed. The process is actually really simple this year because they're now allowing online disability registrations! I actually really didn't want to apply for accommodations either, but once I found out the process had been changed, it's a whole lot easier.   Keep in mind if you want other accommodations other than the time and a half and extra breaks, the process is much more complicated.   If you've got anymore questions I can try and answer them. 
So I bought a PR jersey after the Ducks series and wore it for the first time during game 1 and that was a mistake. It's in closet for game 2. We got this one locked up boiz  
Don't think with your dick. Sounds to me like she's saying everything you want/need to hear. You're going up against a professional so keep that in mind.  What's more likely? She's a prostitute with a heart of gold or that she's found a mark?
Duly noted. 
Avelline is described as a woman shaped battering ram but she is really more of a woman shaped shield.
I came here for laughs of the many hahaha. Not for the feels!
Thanks!! 
&gt; Using my phone 99% of the time I'm on Reddit  Even at home? (&gt;ლ)  I can't maneuver around the apps to save my life. 
I had it happen while jumping to the Broken Shore too.  I may have pulled a Captain Kirk NOOOOOOOOOOOOOO.
You'll never believe me, but I swear Curtis Axel and Ricochet in my 2k16 game. I wouldnt onow if it wasnt for universe mode. I would play and everything flowed. The selling animation seemed to fit both people, and they visually were an interesting combo. Axel has like 6 inches on him and has a pouch going. Ricochet is like Finn, so it just worked. My favorite match I've ever played was their blowoff match for the IC title in a steel cage. I won by doing Ricochet's finisher (a 630 senton) and sprinting to climb up the cage and kicking Axel back down as he tried to grab me. It was so good.
It's nice and thick. That curve is hot. It can cause some interesting sensations.
I'm just not going to think about it, lol.
I mean, I know that's rhetorical, but obviously, yes. They also know that "progressives" (especially around here) are so blinded by their hatred of Hillary Clinton that they'll ignore all of the important warnings she's throwing out to the party and the country for 2018 and 2020.  The woman should just go ahead and change her first name to Cassandra.
Ok, and what's your point kid? But you do poke fun at other's grammar keyboard warrior. 
He already has access and you were obviously never a trump fan cause he's far more center of the line than he was when he was running.
No, I get annoyed when someone posts a picture of an album that's been posted a 100 times, and says nothing about the content. I actually upvoted you a few days ago because you posted some albums I've never heard of, AND wrote a nice description of the music. I've added them to my list of groups to check out. 
This has just gotten so bad. There was that pilot and his wife in Dayton who did a speedball in March and it was laced with carfentanyl. They both died and were discovered by their kids.  I think I'm gonna take the county up on that narcan class with the free couple doses. I just don't know who/when I'm going to find in OD at some point.
Sequel content. Is that, legal? 
Careful now. Wouldn't want them to burst the budget they allocated to WvW.
Bonus points if you rub the back of Trump's hand on your crotch.
Well, to be fair, it's hard to jerk off multiple people at the same time without being in a circle.
Or a fur coat from Burlington Coat Factory.
This one is my favorite 
Odd behaviour recently??? 
Not just foreigners my friend 
Do not post your or hint to your kik username, kik group name, link or hashtag in this subreddit, instead PM it to people who you wish to talk to. Read the guidelines to see why.  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/dirtykikpals) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Anyone have a link to the video? I have so many questions... 
Hell, even someone without a pulse would've done.
Cowboys because it will feel good. 
MOON GUARD   =3  it's fine as long as you avoid Goldshire
boa.. ai teremos so subs sobre gelecas
Wait, you didn't live with your mom and she switched out your mattress without you knowing? I don't know why, but having people in my home when I'm not there or don't know they are there bothers me so much. Like gives me anxiety attacks. I don't even know why, but my siblings and mom know not to go there without checking in with me. One of my stepbrothers started going to my house to do yard work without talking to me and totally messed up my yard and lawn-mower. I had a melt down when I found out and my whole family thinks I'm over reacting to my step brother causing my riding mower to completely stop working. Maybe I know why I feel this way. lol
Catfish being thrown at fans?
Why is this WTF?  It's just a tornado forming.  The only here that is WTF is the videographer is more concerned about filming than getting safe.  That said if the area doesn't get many tornado's, they might not know what to actually do.
What the fuck is a boobsi?
mother of god.
Thanks for all the comments, you guys rock!
did you make a throwaway just for this post?
I am truly astonished that your $7 did not buy you special treatment, and that you still had to go through the same customer support process like every other customer.   Fun fact, I recently received a DOA item as well. Customer service referred me to forums, tech on forums asked me a couple of questions to make sure I wasn't missing anything, and I got a free replacement in the mail the next day.  What you are missing is that the job of front-line customer service is not to fix your problem. Their do not have the technical expertise to determine what the problem is, much less how to fix it. Their job is to refer you to the person with the correct technical expertise. So, when they do that, and you say "no thanks", that's… not helpful. At all. To anyone.
I agree with everything here except the motherboard. You mention Ryzen having difficulty reaching high clock speeds. It'll be especially difficult on a mobo that only supports up to 2666. ;) Just get something other than Asus like [this MSI board](https://ca.pcpartpicker.com/product/BDRFf7/msi-b350-gaming-plus-atx-am4-motherboard-b350-gaming-plus). 
Missing tonights game, cheer them on for me boys
&gt; * Adjusted: Meaning_of_Life goal deemed too difficult, reduced difficulty by half. Meaning of life is now 21.    Haha brilliant
Did the Jonas SBC and got Perisic! :)
Wot???
MEME GOLD RIGHT HERE ROFL
I smoke. Parents don't know. I'm 29. It's a respect thing. 
You 2 play nice now.
Actually it's more like we are attacking the Middle East.. and for decades they have been bombed and in a warzone power vacuum for resources and political reasons .. this allows for faith based violence to spread..   If we are talking numbers i would bet that the average Muslim in the world is more peaceful and a better person than the average American.. there are 5 times as many of them as us..   The Middle East would still be violent if there were no religions.. it's a shit show over there and it's not because every single Muslim is a backwards savage.. 
Kensei tho. Why you hate him ubi :/ 
We're all here for you bud. I'm terribly sorry for your loss.
Albatros D.V's of Jadgstaffel 5.  The aircraft in this painting from left to right beginning with the star and crecent:  Josef Mai, 30 victories.  Survived the war and passed away in 1982.  Hans Joachim von Hippel, 4 victories.  Survived the war and flew Ju-52s in the Luftwaffe during WWII.  Died in 1975.  Fritz Rumey, 45 victories.  KIA Sept. 27, 1918 due to parachute failure.  Ltn. Wolf, 2 victories.  No further information known about this pilot.
right click &gt; hook &gt; left click &gt; meelee. Haven't tried it on the PTR but the amount of health left looks like that should work.
That's exactly what I think about Ann Coulter. Coulter is twice the man that Kathy Griffin is.
I switch teams nearly every every game of operations I play! I don't understand why there is so much hate?
Elena isn't an official Disney Princess^TM.  She did have a welcoming ceremony. 
It's really brave of you to have written everything out in a letter. That must have taken a lot of strength to do. Definitely give yourself credit for accomplishing that!  I would bring it, and ask if she would prefer to read it or have you read it to her. Crying would be absolutely okay! As far as the emails, you could bring them and ask her what she thinks.  I think she'll be impressed that you're taking so much initiative right away, but also be prepared for her to have some intake questions of her own!  Best of luck to you, friend. Always here if you need to talk. Let us know how it goes!
Who isn't? Talk to someone long enough and you will see the demon within them
I fucking love this comment 
Toos is staying until at least January 2018, and Threes is opening some time in August. Toos is DEFINITELY not closed yet!
again, i am aware that all of the stuff is fine. and also aware that most people are cool with it. im not trying harsh anyones vibe on roo. i love it there and yes i understand that theres a lot of good stuff going on too. i specifically was not trying to say im better than anyone. if anything, im just working through some thoughts. i can delete my posts if that will make you feel better, i just dont think anyones opinions of what should and shouldnt be at the fest are invalid. i didnt stop enjoying bonnaroo for any of those reasons and imho its a pretty small thing. i understand being defensive, but i know im not the only one with that perception either.  bonnaroo is about the people and the music, not the sponsors. that said i think its okay to have a discussion about it.  edit: also just read all the responses to this thread, you gonna respond to everyone?
My mistake. Thanks 
I genuinely don't know. The first Thor movie is in my top two for the MCU, and I'm *so* excited for Taika and Karl and Tessa, but I hated The Dark World. As for Justice League, I actually loved Batman vs Superman and am really excited to see Ezra and Jason in their roles.  Basically, I'm just really pumped for November.
&gt; Subscribe: /Stalwart_Shield
Federal candidates file with the FEC, state candidates file with their state election offices. Filing deadlines vary by state. Most serious gubernatorial and senatorial candidates will have declared by the end of the summer but everyone else might take longer.
Internet/social media/phone addiction are buzzwords that are thrown around with very little meaning these days. While these addictions certainly do exist, they're not *nearly* as common as you might be lead to believe by the generations before us who are struggling to cope with how communication and entertainment has changed over the course of their lifetime.  Anyway, "mind your own business," is a great response to that stupid bullshit. She's going for really low-hanging fruit with an accusation like that.
Covfefe?
Now Tayne I could get into
Yeah, they need to pull some points off the crisis suits.  Dropping them down to 32 per suit might be helpful.
I'm not alone!!!
tbh I like sluggo's more
Not all of it is weapons, I am giving them some other stuff, just was having trouble balancing the weapons and making them interesting.
Yep!  Cool watches at affordable prices. Design watches based on popular models for certain time periods, IE 1970.
Back when I was tossing metal objects for fame and glory, and failing both, I was told their upper limit was 185lbs.   What are they today?
That's the shit I worry about. That's how the ISIS fucks exist. They took their text literally, and all the garbage that made ISIS extreme is in the christian bible too.  Give em enough leeway and you could have groups in the rural parts of the country practicing "christian law" like that. Why? Because the bible "told them to."
look at the guy on the left after the captain tells the chick to scan
Having lived in Raleigh and moved to Orlando, I'd kill for the bike friendliness of Raleigh.  I understand the frustration but there were dedicated trails and shared roads with bike routes labeled unlike here where it's a free for all.
Alfaro and Delem forgot that they are supposed to defend, not just let people walk through and shoot.
nice ring :D 
Sure looks comfy 
The problem is that there is a difference between someone being *legally* right and *morally* right. The Supreme Court doesn't (typically) make decisions based on how the law ought to be, but rather on their interpretation of how it actually is. So it is VERY possible for the Supreme Court to make a ruling that is morally wrong, yet legally unassailable.
This is reasonale advice. It's good to be cautious but some people recommend being way more cautious than necessary 
It was a EDM festival. So DJs aka "Fuckers"  Edit: words
I made my first order too earlier in the month from fragnet , adg Profumo and la nuit. Definitely will use them again actually planning to use them to get some of the recommendations from everyone. I bought my gf a gift set of olympea from Macy's for $100 over the weekend and she went to tj max today and saw the same exact set for $60. I will absolutely never buy retail again. Ever
I read the comment above and I wouldn't regard it as being personally critical, rather it is highlighting a very obvious point. Also, people don't always know what you are already doing, and if you have said so, don't always read it or take it in. I made a real cock-up the other day when I lost track of the sequence of exchanges between some folks on one post and sent my response to the wrong person. All I could do was to apologize unreservedly and blamed it on becoming a senile geriatric.  Your problem is that your husband with all his issues is likely to push back a lot harder than some because he is probably incapable of looking at what is being said to him, to second guess or anticipate it and to react in a sophisticated, thoughtful, strategic or diplomatic way. Having said that a lot of people fail to do that and they have not been diagnosed with ADHD. He simply doesn't have the emotional maturity to meet you at your level and given the ADHD he may never develop it, even late on.  The whole thing is obviously getting to you in a big way (that's not a criticism, just an observation), and it's maybe leaking out beyond the immediate interaction between you and him. It would be hardly surprising if it was. Apart from the therapy you are going to, do you have any other outlets or coping strategies for dealing with this? For example, would meditation, yoga, mindfulness, tai chi be of any help to you? Exercise is recommended a lot, so going to the gym is a good thing. Watch out for depression or anxiety creeping up on you in a big way. I'm talking about physical symptoms from it.
Because you were a lakers fan five years ago /s
So essentially you gashed your gash.  
10 Team H2H 5x5 standard  Should I trade my Dallas Keuchel for his Billy Hamilton?  My other SPs are:  DeGrom Cole Tanaka Maeda Nola Ray Harvey DL: Syndergaard DL: Taillon  My OF's/UTL Cain Ozuna Fowler Thames Maybin UTL: Alonso DL: Trout  
No, I constantly come against people who's levels I can't see
Jeremy Corbyn 
Damn that's awful. I always thought the fan art depicted their own ignorance, not Martin's. 
I mean Sonic Boom is really good and the Sonic R soundtrack is fun to laugh at/with but you right
I always drew a connection between the arm going numb and something called "Radial Neuropathy (Saturday Night Palsy)" which happens when someone takes too many drugs and falls asleep on an arm, thus causing the numbness of the arm and so on and so on...
But if you were mentally challenged and you didn't know it, but you just went on with life like it was supposed to be lived in a prison? And if you knew you were mentally challenged would you think that it was a life worth living?
They're usually just referred to as eight rings or juggling eights...
that's awesome. Matchups with GTown and Oregon/UConn is great, even if its a down year for said programs. Nice Gonzaga is in the other bracket. 
Specially the eval/frocking part.  Parent COC is not going to fight for the guy that left over the guy that's now working harder to pick up the slack  And the TAD COC is not going to fight for the random guy that just showed up  over their own people
[Favorite characters with one word names.](http://i.imgur.com/uXTHcHm.jpg)
Its like chrystal extract or something like that very pure thc but no flavour at all.
I originally was awful with her a few days ago and suffered a lot of games, but someone here showed me a build and now I feel like she is working a lot better. The mistakes I see in my matches now feel more like my mistakes rather than being underpowered. She's a lot of fun but I'm trying to learn more. Really the only adc I play is kogmaw 
This.  I've always said, having defense tiles gives you a deathless run that week, but likely 0 defense wins.  But come the next week with regular maps, it'll be slightly harder to snag a deathless run but you'll be more likely to get a defense.  I still think all maps should be mixed together.
Do you still have some more?   I have 1k + CC1 decal, CC2 decal and merc flower power decal
Another thought...  If you were not in the exact place at the exact time to see the chicken for example, it wouldn't have felt so synchronistic. So, that begs the question...  When did the synchronicity start?  When you woke up that morning? When you cracked the first egg for your omlette? If you didn't leave at the exact time you did that day it could have changed the entire course of events for the day.  Or did the synchronicity begin at birth? If you weren't born at the exact time and place you were born, you never would have had the egg n chicken day.  Or maybe it began at the beginning of time... the point is, every moment could technically be considered a synchronicity... because nothing is more synchronistic than our planet orbiting the sun in the perfect position to foster our civilization from microbes to the point we have advanced to today.
I don't think that's necessarily true. Plants usually bloom in the morning with the presence of sunlight. Unless it's a peace lily or a lotus, it won't spread pollen at night.
Mendes also brought in a lot of crap. And if not crap, players who didn't work out.
I deserve the win because my orders with other sellers are delayed as fuck.
The FB app (on Android, at least) has a stream of recent photos at the top. It's probably really easy to accidentally share something from there if you're just smashing the screen.  That said, stop giving your kid your phone until you've hidden your partial nudes. /r/trashy calling.
Parfaitement cohérent si on considère que et Mélenchon et Le Pen font partis des extrêmes (ce qui est une opinion impopulaire au sein de la FI, mais consensuelle partout ailleurs) : tant que c'est Le Pen contre Macron (ou avant ça le candidat LR) il n'y a pas de danger de voir les extrêmes se faire confier le pouvoir. Si Mélenchon commence à se rapprocher de la seconde place là il y a danger.
might be why kenny Mcintosh left whatculture maybe he knew shit was about to go down and wanted to distance himself from it
No thanks man. Not interested in exotics unless they're painted. Thanks though good luck!
Fairly sure nothing returned from that incident. 
Thanks for the recommendation! Looking into it. 
It's absolutely stunning :) keep up the imagination I'm jealous :)
Was Shuppet burned?
Hey Anon! Welcome!!
I've never bought presale before.. but how early should I log on before tickets are live? :)
i can see where you are coming from. I do not understand these new terms myself like to me a pansexual is just  bisexual. my theory on all this is is that people who go along with these terms are people who do not want to be labeled gay,lesbian,or bisexual because to them that label means something negative. I could be wrong but that is my theory. I do not mind people calling themselves different things as they are not hurting anyone however, I really do not understand it. 
About 95%, yeah. I have to do a bunch of fine tuning and source a grille. I'm not counting the eventual AC and 4 speed toploader.
Imgur started because the other hosting sites were total garbage. Now we need another imgur I guess.
No. I'm not going to support someone I like less just because they are younger; that makes no sense. If he shows himself physically able to run, then he gets my vote.  He was the VP 5 months ago; it's not like that isn't a taxing job. 
 As a reminder, this subreddit [is for civil discussion.](https://www.reddit.com/r/politics/wiki/rulesandregs#wiki_please_be_civil)  In general, be courteous to others. Attack ideas, not users. Personal insults, shill or troll accusations, hate speech, and other incivility violations can result in a permanent ban.  If you see comments in violation of our rules, please report them.  ***   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/politics) if you have any questions or concerns.*
You'd have to add more sorry
Go for it!  I use male or ambiguous names on literally everything except my tumblr and deviantart which aren't remotely linked back to any of my gaming stuff.  I've been very fortunate to find some great people to play with who don't care about gender and just want to play.  Heck, my favorite discord is about half and half for gender. I will admit we don't play MOBAs or MMOs and the community I play with grew out of the necessity to find *some way* to communicate during Splatoon ranked matches.  It's also had a significant amount of pruning and bans to curtail harassment.  My friends I used to play league with were all girls or trusted IRL friends so maybe poke around on here for a group to play with if a game you enjoy lets you build your own teams and isn't just random matchups. I do tend to speak with a lower voice (hallelujah for being an alto) when playing online games with people I don't know and often get asked if I'm a guy or a girl.  Whenever people ask I just say "well what do *you* think?" and that tends to either lead to hilarious tangents or shut people up.  Another great thing to say is "I'm a veloceraptor. Gender doesn't matter."
&gt;Alright, like mock meets and things of that nature?   No, more likely the more you compete in actual meets and become exposed to the stress of lifting while anxious the more you adapt to that specific stress.
Yeah.  I agree with the author that there are limits to what's offensive in this context, but am not impressed with the attempted reasoning.
Really? How do you get away with it?
[Streamable mirror](https://streamable.com/4fcmo) ___  I'm a bot. If you have any suggestions you can message my creator here: [PM](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=eRodY&amp;subject=[TwitterToStreamable]%20-%20t3_6ej18c)
They are in fact the worst way to train your magic up.   Also lose the $ sign when describing your wealth. Training your magic level with slayer will be the most common response you'll receive from this sub. Training on many specific types of mobs will yield good xp/charms and gp/h, usually you won't spend any money on training magic and it'll always be above 300k xp/h (in some places 2M+ xp/h) Since we don't know your slayer level I can't recommend you which mobs to do but just for general knowledge the places you mentioned Fight Pits &amp; Soul Wars are completely dead.   Abyss is packed with people who don't know about other methods but it's certainly nowhere near good. The only redeeming quality of this place is that it's afk, very afk. You'll spend between 15M and 20M for 99 from 80 so 80-85 is probably like... 3M? this cost can be reduced by owning the "Corruption Blast" ability (which costs 13M) and using EoC with Revolution. Since it costs more to buy the ability if you don't own it there's no point in buying it just to reduce the cost.
There are [lions](http://fireemblem.wikia.com/wiki/Lion) and [tigers](http://fireemblem.wikia.com/wiki/Tiger) and [cats](http://fireemblem.wikia.com/wiki/Cat), oh my!
??
I'm not sure about 5e leveling,  but in 2e 1/10th of character experience usually keeps them significantlyweaker, bit still relevant.  
Can we discuss how much better salty-Gloria's hair is vs. spiritual-Gloria??
I tried it by myself as well, couldn't pull it of with the TP :(
You would think white hersey kisses.
But this doesn't make sense. If there is a Shaco in the game, one team has to win. 
Is he not testifying under oath????
I did not edit. There would have been a * on it. Plus, your answer without the edit is the same even with the edit.
It's like Perma mixed with 'It Don't Think It Is' style Say Anything, doesn't really work in my opinion. 
i guess both. im also kinda scared of not starting soon enough. i turned 18 a few months ago, im staying with my parents until i graduate college because in state tuition and convenience.
It's better than that. If you hurt a teammate, there is a wound penalty added to the timer. There are no excuses apparently. Am I the only one who wants to get rid of the penalty completely?
Game of thrones  Too goofy looking
Pretty sure Zeus Aghs doesn't give true sight unless it hits something. Might be wrong.
Well if you have a full team of bomber you probably end up with 10% aswell :/
3 for dracos?
D.I. mostly but a hartke 4x10 XL with an SVT Pro 7. 
[are we doing this?](https://puu.sh/w76dh/e8c70046ec.jpg) 
Welcome to siege.  Check out the sub r/rainbow6  If you're a fan of strategy based FPS, you'll love it.  Tachankas blessings. 
 **Off-Topic Discussion**: All top-level comments must be a story or poem. Reply here for other comments.  #####Reminder for Writers and Readers: * Prompts are meant to inspire new writing.  Responses don't have to fulfill every detail.  * Please remember to [be civil](https://www.reddit.com/r/WritingPrompts/wiki/rules#wiki_rule_10.3A_be_civil) in any feedback.  ---  [](#icon-help)[^(What Is This?)](https://www.reddit.com/r/WritingPrompts/wiki/off_topic) [](#icon-information)[^(First Time Here?)](https://www.reddit.com/r/WritingPrompts/wiki/user_guide) [](#icon-exclamation)[^(Special Announcements)](https://www.reddit.com/r/WritingPrompts/wiki/announcements) [](#icon-comments)[^(Click For Our Chatroom)](https://www.reddit.com/r/WritingPrompts/wiki/chat)
Not by my consent, I've never even heard of the company.
It's almost like our entire backline is near-rookies and midfielders.
But if the unmasking uncovers probable cause of further crimes that could be used to obtain a court order for surveillance of their calls. It's hard to imagine a scenario where the unmasking would come to light without the person unmasked being involved in an underlying crime.
It's not facing 4 ways, the image is just really fucked up. I'll stitch the 4 quarters where they "should" be and upload 
I think they would want to maintain certain synergies from the team members. From YBT, i can safely assume that they would get at least ryu and possibly tobi as well. However, i also sense that he feels reluctant to put more LH players in the team even though miro is an amazing player.  My guess is that we might see manno + flex tank at tanker positions since manno is insane on both rein and winston like miro. For flex, it would be either zunba or hoon or libero depending on the need of dps / dva player. (Personally i think its safe to pick zunba)  For dps... i think we might see duo from a team like healers. If flow3r is healthy, flow3r-pine might b decent but kdp dps duo is insane as well. I dont think they want to pick dps from different teams to bring as much synergy as possible.  My predictions are...  Ryu - Tobi - Manno - Zunba - Rascal - Birdring
Sunset Park bro
Beautiful! Really great color. I'm sure she'll love it! 
then when i should take Ralox? before gyno comes or after? I wouldn't have Ralox for the first 2 weeks but would that be fine?
booster vs acute dosage friend, but you may be right about the disease  edit: turns out it is rabies. 
The LE version comes with 3 mags (2 with pinky extensions, 1 without) and Tritium Night sights.
Most definitely
&gt; In fact this is a masjid in the institutions that quote from? Also it is a masjid in the institutions that quote from? Also it is a masjid in the institutions that quote from? Also it is a masjid in the institutions that quote from? Also it is a masjid in the institutions that quote from? Also it is a masjid in the institutions that quote from? Also it is a masjid in the institutions that quote from? Also it is a masjid in the institutions that quote from? Also it is a masjid in the institutions that
look man, it's not the size of the inbox that matters, in fact many women say a large inbox hurts
Unfortunately not, just glanced through most of them. The topic was more related to political science than psychology.
I love myself...thank you, come again...
That's great thanks. Similar to myself 👍
Decently affordable ammo. Very affordable gun. Easy to disassemble and clean. Fun shooter.
RIP Alexey Navalny :(
You definitely shouldn't have a child you don't want to please someone else.
Always refresh orbfests. Always. Even if it's just ~25....well, except for Goldor orbfests.
Do you ever go in for a general wellness appointment or just when you're ill?  Although I think if you're young (&lt;30 or &lt;40?) and don't tick any of the risk factors (underweight, overweight, etc.) they might not necessarily do a blood panel. 
REEEEEEEEEE
I still don't get what your point is.  That's accurate, whether you want to call it Music or Media.  Even at its most pure, it's still music on a television platform... both being types of media.
Ｃ^Ｏ^Ｖ^Ｆ^Ｅ^Ｆ^Ｅ
Yeah, I'd like to see one of GCC versions and chrome built in under 3 hours.
Sorry I was clicking on it and said page not found so that's why
OOOOh someone who read the upcoming roadmap [;\]](http://i.imgur.com/BlTml2W.gif)
There is a lot of opinion on this and some medical professionals chiming in.   In my experience, normal crazy glue works fine. I have students cut themselves in the bush all the time. I provide them with crazy glue in their field kit. I also show them how to clean the cut first and how to glue it without filling the wound, but rather using it like a bandage on the surface of the skin.   Four years, several hundred tubes of crazy glue with no abscesses, necrotic hands, or zombies yet. But again, by a medical professional here.  Final note, I will be looking at the medical version of crazy glue now thanks to the above advice.
Hell yes, thanks for replying
I use the GVP brand wand from Sally's. I believe it's a 1".  The key is the product you use with it. I use a great curl spray with my wand and my curls last all day whereas they never did before this combination. This wand gets seriously hot and it's the best wand I've had and I've used everything from expensive to cheap.  http://www.sallybeauty.com/gvp-1-inch-professional-clipless-curling-iron/SBS-264848,default,pd.html?utm_source=google&amp;utm_medium=cpc&amp;utm_campaign=SHO&amp;cm_mmc=google-_-SHO-_-cpc-_-keyword&amp;gclid=COjSvaGrm9QCFQEDaQodaKgGdA
I would not be able to say "NO"
Morkwarg is locked all the time with Auckes
I've always had a feeling that paul himself is not uploading the videos, but that someone else (probably a group of people, or 2 people max, given the 'we' in that warning about censorship) found them and is posting them for unknown purposes
Wonder if we're going for Gustavo again
 I noticed that you mentioned **`yaourt`**. This tool is generally not recommended for use. It is insecure due to sourcing PKGBUILDs before the user has a chance to read them.  Consider using a [different AUR helper](https://wiki.archlinux.org/index.php/AUR_helpers#Comparison_table). **`pacaur`** is generally considered a good alternative. It has very similar usage and syntax, allowing easy switching. [Here is a link to its AUR page.](https://aur.archlinux.org/packages/pacaur/) In addition to being vastly more secure, it has a friendlier interface. It asks for package confirmations at the beginning of the installation process, allowing unattended installation.  Thanks for using Arch Linux!  ^(I am a bot. | )[^Creator](https://www.reddit.com/user/alienpirate5) ^(| Unique string: 7667adf3cb547799)
It materializes as a lid to one of your ziploc containers
Aside from some potential FOIA document retention problems and some past stances on censorship in media, she's a damned solid candidate. (I say this as someone obsessed with free speech. ) Logically she did better than most candidates could have. 
Hey man. I know I'm just some stranger on the internet but, if you just want somebody to chat with, send me a pm. You're not worthless, and nothing lasts forever. Just think: things have to change, sooner or later. And the only way to go is up!
/u/lordofsaiduq
Thanks, but... Look at the images of a peacock mantis shrimp, Theres so many variations of them... :/ sorry
I think that's basically what pussy said.
The smart ones would. 
TNG
My suggestion would be to think up all your questions, and create a survey where you self-report your ideology. Then you can weight how much a question affects you based on averages.  Also I have a theory that "strongly agree/disagree" options add no value and you should just do agree/unsure/disagree, but I don't have any proof to back that up.
Oh. okay! We've hit upon the poet's digital dilemma in an age of non-standard media platforms.
Hiding in the shadows. Really takes this gif to another level. 
I thought it meant I had to give an organ within the next few years. I didn't realize it was when I die. I'm just an idiot.
Looks amazing. Parallax doesn't deserve to be lower than Hexed and Slipstream imo
Yeah kind of like how /r/funny has OC too 
You might qualify for FL medicaid, but I don't know enough about those plans to advise you further. 
I'll see you tonight....
That would be too OP. Everyone would use Mettler with Recoil+Clip capacity.
ENTER SANDMAN!
Norway, Denmark and Sweden has been AAA since 1990, 2001 and 2004 respectively. 
It'd be amazing to see the Bolts embrace the spirit of Gasparilla. 
Scavenged Wiimote wrist straps.
Someone submit this to Ubisoft 
it's ridiculous. call the fucking game. I'm so sick of the strike zone this year.
Game hasn't even started and someone is in serious downvote mode already
Ze weten niet beter. 
When did he ever say he didn't know him?? they've been friends for something like 40 plus years.... 
i bought these adorable babies inside as eggs on one of my many sacrificial cabbages, and now they're eating their way into my good cabbages (but i hate cabbage so they can have it)   they used to be bright green but turned brown in the past few days
I'll add you tonight. I wasn't able to get on today but we can run some games tomorrow 
Just go with the behemoth. It'll work out eventually.
6k for crimson tachyon
Best of luck!
I think this will be a new compilation of old clips with a few newer pics for gravy. 
Can someone give me a TLDR of what happened? 
[What's the number on his sleeve?](https://youtu.be/Vxq9yj2pVWk)
Moonluminati confirmed.
are you using windows on mac?
Didn't think that needed mentioning, but yeah.
I don't have any insight on your method, I just wanted to say that many people have found help in the book the easy way by alan carr. Don't expect magic it doesn't help immidiately for everyone but a lot of it is motivation and there's a lot of useful stuff in there.  You'll find it on YouTube if you want to check it out,  Good luck!
I'll bet $100 that Ted Cruz or some other GOP Senator is going to ask a DUMB AS FUCK, deflection question like:  "When did you come to know about Hillary emails?"  or  "What memos do you have with conversations with Obama."  or  " I know this is treason,  but who leaked this stuff?"
which is sadly what they do. These groups tell their followers that anyone who doesnt think like them is an infidel
You dont really take books to class, just notebooks and maybe a laptop.   I use a regular jansport one that I have had since junior year of hs and I have had no issues. 
Man that White MDJK is fire. I got 1/4 of a kilo when the sale he had going on, it totally surprised me. 
LOL
I like your name! And your centerpieces! :D   Honestly, it sounds like she hasn't done anything or, if she did, it was a really half-assed job. I'd give her a deadline. Depending on how innocuous you want to sound: "Could you please send me some photos of the centerpieces by [date]? If you can't, no worries! I'll just go ahead and order them. Thanks so much!" or "Woman. My leetle trees? Gib dem to me. &gt;:| Or I go buy my own leetle trees."
I'm currently watching star wars rebels and it's honestly been making me think of kreia with the whole conflict between light and dark and finding a balance somewhere in between.  I'm surprised they've actually gone that route in a kids show. 
I read he wants to stay with Roma still
this is true but not near as much as OW. with re rolls i dont think it will ever be as bad.
PSA: While this is a historic lowest *on Steam*, a quick search reveals its gone as low as $15.99 on sites like [WinGamesStore](https://www.reddit.com/r/GameDeals/comments/6ajw1o/wingamestore_mafia_iii_159960_mafia_iii_digital/) just 20 days ago. So its up to you.  Me personally? The game is ~$13 in India and even then I ain't buying it. Waiting for the price to drop 65% at least. The fuckin DEMO of this game caused BSODs on my PC, so yeah no.
The only reason to wait for promotion that I have seen is for grind-heavy runs focusing on maxing stats, otherwise it is not very viable in regular playthroughs.
what the fuck...
But he can follow up super fast with another shotgun blast.
Are US military operations classified before details are released to the public?  Trump boasted about telling the Chinese leader about the attack on a syrian airbase (before tying to advertise the chocolate cake at his resort club).
I think stomach acid problems may have something to do with it. I found out last week I've had some stomach barrier and acid problems which fucks up a lot of stuff with your metabolism possibly. 
I would like everyone who is deeply troubled to see this. I think this comics shows it is possible to turn your troubles into something good. But that's because there are people who read this, who translated this, and who drew this. I have a chronic condition with my pituitary glands and medical complication from that of kidney failure. But I still wanted to do something. This is, in comics form, the words I most want to say and most want to be told. No matter what happens, as long as this comic remains, I will live on in this comic, and a mother will live on in her child's memory. The enemy you can't see is the one inside you. The important thing is to have the bravery to change. I will not lose to my condition and I will keep living.
Tarik costing again, unreal...
The above submission has been **removed** because:   * It contains an external url.  External URL are not allowed on /r/relationships.  You must remove the url/link.  If you feel you are receiving this message in error or are confused, please [contact the moderators](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Frelationships&amp;subject=Submission+removed+for+External+URL&amp;message=My+post+can+be+found+at:+https://www.reddit.com/r/relationships/comments/6eignc/found_out_former_gf_20_f_is_pregnant_i_21_m_need/) and explain your problem.  You must make suitable edits to ensure that the submission confirms to **all the rules** listed in the sidebar, and in the [wiki](/r/relationships/wiki/index#wiki_about_.2Fr.2Frelationships) (relevant for mobile users).  When you are done, please repost your submission. ---  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/relationships) if you have any questions or concerns.*
ooh
This. Came here to say logistics are key! Rolling dinner into tomorrow's vittles is a clutch move- Getting myself dialed-in before personal and professional endeavors has been the bedrock for a lot of joy and achievement in my life.
I don't get defensive when people suggest I should try not to kill people. I get defensive when people suggest accountability for their personal safety falls 100% on my shoulders regardless of whether or not they choose to *wander around in the road wearing night camo.  But you raise an interesting point. That would be so outrageous if they had orange safety vests for people to wear in the woods during hunting season along with a bunch of cautionary tales of people who wore fur; thank goodness there's none of that. I'm just gonna go walk around the shooting range in a blindfold but please don't be a horrible monster and deliberately kill me in cold blood by not being infallible and omniscient, OK?
Yes it is. I'm not sure about drug tests, but assuming you live in the USA and it's all kinds of fucked up down there, I wouldn't be surprised. 
Got you!!!
Unscrew it, and wiggle the components out of the case. You'll need to remove the caps that are on the potentiometers. You can buy a small metal project enclosure that you should be able to fit it into. Make sure you measure everything out and mark where you need to drill the holes for the potentiometers and foot switch, as well as the input/output. Whether you want to drill for the LED indicator lights or not, is up to you. There are also plastic cases that you can use, but they don't tend to hold up as well. It's basically just a lot of measuring and drilling. Not too big of a deal, just tedious. 
Either the podcast or she's attention whoring like she tends to do
Did you add the vlan to the vlan database?  sho vlan   I think that should show you what's in there. 
It's a smoke screen. "This will keep you idiots occupied while we do some shady shit this week."
Yes, many cities have bad roads, but why is Baltimore one of the worst for overall tax burdens as well for cities?  Where is all that money going then if they're obviously not fixing the roads?
Historical and sci-fi wargamers have been using 3D printed pieces for a few years now.  When Wizards of the Coast discontinued all of its Axis &amp; Allies collectible miniature games, the community embraced Shapeways.  I'd link to examples, but their site is unusually slow to load right now.
YOU ARE AWESOME 👏👏👏👏👏
Just to pull a job out of my ass, utility locators make $15-25/hour depending on experience and training can be done in a couple weeks.
yes because winston and 50% of the attack/defense are sooo reliant on teamwork
They'd have staff managing the systems, but no longer need the payments then you should not be sold off ever IMO. Its only impediment is political courage in the face of it, not so simple as just give people a choice, I hink it would be bad for children to be respectful of others.
It could be if your card is outputting less fps than the monitor refresh rate in hz. You have no tearing with freesync and no additional input lag. 
Their meta sarcastic schtick gets old quick
The coexistence of sharps and flats are pretty important. To be brief, let me show you just one simple example. Suppose you're in the scale of C minor, and you're not allowed to just flats. What would it look like?  C, D, D#, F, G, G#, A#.  As you can see, there's two versions of D, two versions of G, and, you jump straight from A# to C, with no B to be found. Flats would make this a lot clearer.
No, that's not what prejudice is. Prejudice is basing a preconceived notion without backed by reason or actual experience. We have reasoning behind why cops protect one another. We've seen it. 
I liked the colorful keycaps on the 1990's keyboard shell. 
That other guy was wrong, it's once per match. She has to have curse up for it to work, however. 
Well tbf I'm still kinda peeved with him about the Barkley thing, there was no reason to come at someone for their gambling addictions in that way. But ya he's been in the public eye for 16 years and that's the only dig I have at him, which really is impressive.
This thread has been marked as **[No Spoilers]**. Any story spoilers from all games must be covered with spoiler tags ` [SPOILER](#s "spoiler here") ` or the comment will be removed. Thank you!   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/dragonage) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Miami's accession to the MLS is independent of their decision regarding the other teams. They have been counting on this deal for a few years now and will not discredit Tampa's very viable opportunity just because now they are getting their shit together. Tampa is getting a privately funded stadium in what is a relatively cheap renovation of the current stadium. The club has yet to announce who the other investors will be apart from Bill Edwards, but apart from that Tampa is a  great choice for MLS expansion. The  prospect of a three way derby in the MLS will only improve its marketability in this country.
Almost every sure handed receiver we have picked up has had more drops with stafford. Id rather have staff window catches and the odd drop any day!!
The one that portrays white women as the most oppressed.  After all, they are part of the highest advertising spend demographic....
Nah, orbital mechanics are not really known to be wide open for loose interpretation. Also somewhat dependent on strict definition, the rest of physics. It's literal rocket science, accuracy is basically a key tenet. 
[This update bothers me greatly](https://www.reddit.com/r/announcements/comments/6eh6ga/reddits_new_signup_experience/). I'm gonna be accidentally subscribing to so many subs now...
&gt;Hey nigga, you realize saying big words where they aren't needed only detracts from your point? What the fuck is this sentence anyway? &gt;people feel that such light-heartedness no longer has any place in Presidential discourse. Presidential discourse? Nigga what kinda crack are you on? Presidential is an adjective for acting like a president.  Congrats OP. You made me cringe myself inside out. I'm typing with bloody inverted fingers right now, and just want you to know that I...  Wait. Let me try a thing.  [OH SHIT!](https://www.reddit.com/r/pics/comments/6egttd/the_44th_president_of_the_united_states/dialoq5/)  Done the fucking trick. I cringed myself back into having my skin on the right side again! Shit, I think my dick may even be a little bigger. You truly never know what the day may bring. 
AND MY AXE
If that's not a warning sign for your relationship I don't know what is.
  Snapshots:  1. *This Post* - [archive.org](https://web.archive.org/20170601000017/https://twitter.com/damianpaletta/status/869972656942182402), [_megalodon.jp\*_](http://megalodon.jp/?url=https://twitter.com/damianpaletta/status/869972656942182402 "could not auto-archive; click to resubmit it!"), [_archive.is\*_](https://archive.is/?run=1&amp;url=https%3A%2F%2Ftwitter.com%2Fdamianpaletta%2Fstatus%2F869972656942182402 "could not auto-archive; click to resubmit it!")  *^(I am a bot.) ^\([*Info*](/r/SnapshillBot) ^/ ^[*Contact*](/message/compose?to=\/r\/SnapshillBot))*
From what I've seen, no. If you have done the tutorial it won't let you again.
PL level 25 - removed the limit of illusions can be summoned 
who DIDN'T she fuck?  http://4.bp.blogspot.com/-f5P5A2OEPJc/UU-4T-Mo--I/AAAAAAAAF8s/bcjCdcf1Zcc/s640/jack-black-kathy-griffin.jpg  (jack black, kathy griffin)
*A few knocks on the front door of the cabin can be heard.*
Everyone is saying Betts, so a Betts for Trout trade is basically confirmed.
I have never seen such an insecure world leader like this guy. At first, it was fun, now it is really pathetic. 
Perhaps you should go and find out for yourself.  The way you wrote makes it sound like education is a risk rather than an asset to a free society.
Glad I'm not the only one getting these connection error.
The area where the stadium is being built is a complete dump. One of the worst parts of town, right between Minneapolis and St.Paul, and right on the green line. This development will be a HUGE boost for both cities.
Figured it had to do with performance but couldn't find anything concrete to confirm that...thanks!
That should be a good start. Lots of comments. Good stuff.
Steven universe the show where it's okay to cry and be yourself. 
Go home tornado, you're drunk
It will have zero measurable impact on the global temperature and will waste billions of dollars on pointless practices that harm the economy.
that's deadass awesome.
Thank you. But I still don't get it. Why do they need a two plane design like this to launch rockets? 
There comes a point when we have to come together as a country and say, "Even Trump isn't that stupid." That time is now. He needs to go.
Same. I'm not the girl in the gif, so we're saying the exact same thing here.
3.4
I didn't know that, damn shame
There's a difference between anti "anti-men" and anti feminist. 
Yes and no. Not everyone answers the questions honestly. There are probably more success stories than there are dumpster fire type failures but be prepared for the fact that you may *only* be room-mates with the person you get matched with and not end up being best friends forever. 
Well, if you don't play every day and don't want to buy loot boxes, you can't. 
Do I know whether this story is true? No.  Does Dimwit Dan know whether this story is true? I doubt it, because copy-and-paste is a lot easier than checking for veracity, and that's the way he operates.
The future is bright!
Got the next best thing. ... Burns!
Those are fair points. I certainly didn't give sufficient weight to his wave clear, which is definitely above-average for a bruiser (or any role, really). 
a shitpost for ants
Not in the slightest. He was heavily touted as an anti-establishment candidate in heavy degrees, and he still is. 
More like 3 weeks. Itching stopped within the first week but took 3 weeks for me to see my skin clearing. It was an amazing day!
Too close to home? Me too. 
No, she clearly sees herself that way too. She can't do anything about it though because she's trapped in a depression cycle.
Thinking like a politician:   Require background check for all PALs.   Ban machine guns from civilian ownership.  Require that criminals register their blackmarket guns. 
It is all Janet Jackson's fault.  Before she decided to get her titty out at the Superbowl we didn't have this problem.
#(JEFF AGREES WITH HER)
How get prenate
I would point out that Greek is better for compound words such as yours, and the Romans themselves regularly used Greek roots to create new words since Latin itself does not lend itself to compounds.  For example, Livy mentions:  &gt;Sinuessae natum ambiguo inter marem ac feminam sexu infantem, quos androgynos volgus, ut pleraque, faciliore ad duplicanda verba Graeco sermone, appellat.  In English:  &gt;at Sinuessa a child was born of uncertain sex, as between male and female —the populace call them hermaphrodites^1, as it uses many similar terms, since the Greek language is more apt in compounding words.  1. Obviously, the text has "androgynos" instead of some form of hermaphrodite. Bad choice on the translator's part.
Therapists and psychologists are more fucked up than their patients.
This was perhaps not even the C team. No one from Italy's first or second eleven was playing save for debatably Berardi. Hardly worth taking any stock. 
The dude in that video is my hero. But i hope he cleaned the chalk up I bet the janitors all ready have enough bs they have to clean up.
How tall is that statue?
Apparently you haven't watched many Crew matches. This is far from over.
NOT MY FISH TACOS!
Goodbye Europe 
&gt;in a  deep dark pit of emotion some considerations would go out of the window.  exactly. which is why judging a person for that when the person is at that state of mind is ridiculous
But Borutos eye has been shown before he has encountered Momoshinki. 
Yeahhhh.... I pretty much agree with everything you said. Also, Doom is hands down my favorite Marvel villain next to Doc Ock and Kingpin and the fact that this is the fucking 4TH ATTEMPT at getting the villain right, (not to mention that it's also one of the most EASIEST villains to set up a good character motivation) and the fact that they failed so miserably on every single level just makes me cry painful blood tears.  By the way, you read much comics? Because if you do, I think a Netflix series for Doom based off of Brubaker's Books of Doom mini-series would be just absolutely fantastic....when Marvel Studios gets the rights back lol
Instead of using horizontal rules, just write a bunch of buzzwords in 1pt type in a line, sort of like the security strip on a banknote.
I honestly believe so much of it is simply brand loyalty.
~~grapeshot~~ moneyshot
If the guy is being an all-encompassed douchebag, then I think some dismissive snark is okay, but if s/he really is well-meaning and sincerely looking for help, then I agree with you. It's not hard to ignore questions you find annoying - I do it all the  time with food and dating ones. I also think being ignored helps our reputation more than the snarky, sarcastic dogpile that sometimes happens
When I spoke to them EARLY this AM they were mad as hell @ KathyGriffin. I didn't have to say much more than Hello, I'm a routine resort customer &amp; I don't want this Bitch on your stage ever again!
Great school you've got
No ~~lo haga compa~~
Yes it dilutes the brand don't try and being a condescending ***
I checked the flair and was not surprised 
rn
Have you heard the story of Darth Pineapple Flavorful, it's not a tale Pineapple Pizza Haters would tell you.
I made this my wallpaper  Edit: i was tired and made a spelling error, just now seeing it.
Yes, I have had friends who work as sysadmins and network engineers look it over. I wish I could see an offer in the 120 range. 
FINALLY SOMEONE WHO KNOWS THE PAIN 😭 
Excuse you. you you you, you roach! you prince!
Well,t hey are already developing another game no one knows nothing about, and im going to be willing to bet that shit is on forgelight as well.  The current  version of the engine cant support it, but they can update the engine to fix it, im just guessing its going to be alot of work for someone.
It matters if she doesn't understand the thought process behind what he's saying. Sure, she's hurt, and he's responsible for hurting her. But whether or not he should be held accountable is a different question.   For example, if I'm in a car accident and kill someone, i could be responsible for the pain I've caused that person and that person's family. But if I was following the law and THEY ran the red light, no one is going to throw me into prison. I won't be held accountable for something that is beyond my control.  That can also be applied here. OP's BF gave what he thought was a compliment. It hurt her. She "brought it up to him," and he "doesn't seem to understand what [she's] saying." Who's fault is that? Clearly they need to communicate more.  All of you are throwing this guy under the bus when you're heard only one side of the story. If he is generalizing all women and thinks they're uptight, controlling, whatever, obviously that is bad.   (I'm not saying you're doing this personally--) But you don't have to go on a witch hunt to fix such an easy problem. I think OP is overreacting if she's brought this up ONCE and is considering breaking up with him, given the fact that he doesn't understand where she's coming from.   Edit: it seems like a huge stretch to say he doesn't care how she feels. This really seems to be miscommunication. 
r/Vania
If you need me, call me. No matter where you are. No matter how far.
You're going to get downvoted, but just look at what his son was just doing....*cough* DuPont *cough*
thanks! did not even think about that but makes sense I know there are some on the other side of the house
shouts out to joe
Everyone hates them on Reddit. I honestly don't mind them. So they have favorites. I could care less. I have favorites. Having a guy in there who loves everyone doesn't make for good tv 
